Data Deletion
1.
                                                You have the right to request the deletion of your personal information
                                                that we have collected. To exercise this right, please contact us at
                                                longseagamesup@outlook.co.
2.
                                                If you ask us to delete your account or content, it may take up to 10
                                                days from the time we begin the account removal process or receive the
                                                content removal request to the time your information is deleted.
3.
                                                If you delete your account, we will permanently delete your information
                                                unless we need to retain it as described in this privacy policy. Once
                                                your account has been deleted, you will not be able to re-activate your
                                                account.
Introduction
Thank you for using our
                                                products and services. The following Privacy Policy outlines the
                                                collection and handling of personal information through our
                                                Apps
and
                                                third
parties associated
                                                with this account. Please read and fully understand the relevant terms
                                                and conditions.
LONGSEA LINK
                                                (hereinafter referred to as "we" or "us") is committed to protecting the
                                                privacy of our users. When you use our services, certain information
                                                about you may be collected and utilized. This Privacy Policy explains
                                                how we collect, use, share, transfer, store, manage, and disclose your
                                                information publicly. Additionally, it outlines the methods available to
                                                you for accessing, updating, controlling, and protecting your personal
                                                information.
Special Note
This Privacy Policy is
                                                integral to the services we provide. We ask that you carefully read and
                                                ensure you fully understand the contents of this Privacy Policy before
                                                using our services. If you have any questions, comments, or suggestions
                                                regarding this Privacy Policy or matters related to your personal
                                                information, please contact us at
longseagamesup@outlook.com
. We will
                                                provide feedback and necessary assistance as promptly as
                                                possible.
By installing, using,
                                                registering, or otherwise accessing the App under this Developer
                                                Account, you agree
that you have accepted
                                                this Privacy Policy and have given your informed and express consent to
                                                the collection, use, sharing, transfer, storage, management, and public
                                                disclosure of your personal information in accordance with the
                                                provisions of this Privacy Policy. Thereafter, you shall not claim any
                                                form of defense on the grounds that you have not read the contents of
                                                this Policy.
We may update this
                                                Privacy Policy from time to time, and all updates will be posted online,
                                                in accordance with applicable privacy laws and principles. Your
                                                continued use of our Site or Services after the effective date of such
                                                changes constitutes your acceptance of our Privacy Policy. We will
                                                display an effective date at the top of the page for your
                                                convenience.
1.Information That
                                                May Be Collected And Processed
In the course of using
                                                our services, we may collect the following personal information from you
                                                in various ways to provide and optimize our services and to protect the
                                                security of your account:
1.1 Login data: We
                                                collect your name, email address, and user ID (an identifier associated
                                                with an identifiable user). If you log in to our games using Facebook or
                                                other approved third-party accounts (collectively, "Third-Party
                                                Accounts"), you authorize us to obtain publicly available information
                                                about you that you have registered with the third-party platform (e.g.,
                                                avatar, nickname, and other information you authorize). This information
                                                will be used to store your login details, enabling you to log in on
                                                different devices.
1.2 Voluntarily
                                                provided by users: We may collect, store and process some information
                                                about you when you voluntarily provide to us, such as photos and videos
                                                you choose to upload. We use this data to collect users feedback and
                                                improve our Services.
1.3 Performance data:
                                                To better optimize your experience, we will collect information about
                                                your application's performance (e.g., crash log data, battery life,
                                                loading time, latency, etc.), device ID, or other identifiers. This
                                                information helps us optimize the performance of our products or
                                                services based on your device terminal and network status, improve your
                                                experience, and safeguard the security of your account.
1.4 The Purposes of
                                                Data Use
We take your privacy
                                                seriously and want to be clear about how and why we use your personal
                                                data. This section outlines the purposes for which we collect and
                                                process your data:
·
                                                Providing Services: We use your data to deliver and enhance the Services
                                                you have requested or to fulfill a contract with you. This includes, but
                                                is not limited to, account registration, order processing, and customer
                                                support.
·
                                                Communication: We may use your contact information to communicate with
                                                you about our Services, updates, and important information related to
                                                your account.
·
                                                Improving Services: We collect data to analyze usage patterns and
                                                preferences, enabling us to optimize and improve our Services, ensuring
                                                they meet your needs.
·
                                                Research and Analytics: Anonymous or aggregated data may be used for
                                                research, statistical analysis, and understanding market trends, without
                                                identifying individual users.
·
                                                Legal Compliance: We process your data to comply with legal obligations,
                                                such as tax and regulatory requirements, or in response to valid
                                                requests from authorities.
·
                                                Security: Your data is utilized to monitor and maintain the security of
                                                our services, preventing fraud, unauthorized access, or any illegal
                                                activities.
2.Sharing, Transfer
                                                and Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal
                                                information strictly confidential in accordance with relevant legal
                                                obligations and will not share your personal information with others
                                                without first obtaining your explicit consent or authorization.
                                                Exceptions to this include situations permitted by laws and regulations,
                                                safeguarding the life, property, and other legitimate rights and
                                                interests of you, other users, or other individuals, protecting social
                                                public interests, or complying with mandatory requirements from judicial
                                                or administrative authorities.
We may share your
                                                personal information with our affiliates based on your authorization,
                                                but only to the extent necessary for the purposes described in this
                                                Privacy Policy.
We will retain your
                                                Personal Data only for as long as necessary for the purposes outlined in
                                                this Privacy Policy. We will retain and use your Personal Data to comply
                                                with legal obligations, resolve disputes, provide our Services, and
                                                enforce our legal agreements and policies.
We will also retain
                                                Personal Data and Usage Information for internal analysis purposes and
                                                legitimate business interests, as necessary to improve the functionality
                                                of our Services or for business purposes, or when legally obligated to
                                                retain this data for longer periods.
Your Personal Data
                                                collected through our Services will be retained for as long as permitted
                                                by applicable law or necessary for the respective purpose of collection.
                                                It will be deleted when it no longer serves one of the above-mentioned
                                                purposes or will be anonymized, making it no longer considered Personal
                                                Data. Once we have deleted or anonymized your Personal Data, you will
                                                not be able to exercise the right to access, the right to erasure, the
                                                right to rectification, or the right to data portability.
3.Links to Third
                                                Parties
Our Services may
                                                connect to social media or other services provided by third parties, and
                                                may access third-party services (including advertising and statistical
                                                services) within our products or services. These third-party service
                                                providers may have their own privacy policies that are not governed by
                                                this Privacy Policy.We make reasonable efforts to ensure these
                                                third-party providers comply with relevant laws and take appropriate
                                                security measures, but we cannot guarantee their actions. Despite our
                                                precautions, we cannot ensure the security of data transmitted directly
                                                to these third parties and are not liable for any accidental loss or
                                                unauthorized access caused by them.
A
                                                list of the third parties that operate in our Services can be found in
                                                the APPENDIX
A.
4.How We Protect
                                                Your Personal Information
We take the security of
                                                personal information very seriously and implement all reasonably
                                                practicable measures to protect your information from unauthorized
                                                access, alteration, or disclosure.
4.1 Data Encryption:
                                                All user data we collect is encrypted during transmission to protect it
                                                from unauthorized access, disclosure, use, modification, damage, or
                                                loss.
4.2 Access Control: We
                                                strictly control and monitor access to personal information, allowing
                                                only employees with a need to know and requiring them to fulfill
                                                confidentiality obligations.
4.3 Storage Location:
                                                All personal information collected and generated by us is stored in the
                                                United States.
4.4 Storage Period: We
                                                store your personal information for as long as you use our products or
                                                services. After this period, we will delete or anonymize your
                                                information unless otherwise required by law.
Despite our efforts, we
                                                cannot guarantee 100% security due to technological limitations and
                                                potential malicious actions. In the event of an information security
                                                incident, we will promptly inform you of the incident's nature, impact,
                                                measures taken, and suggestions to mitigate risks.
5.International Data
                                                Transfers
If you use the Service
                                                or provide us with your information, it may be transferred, processed,
                                                and stored on servers or databases located outside your country or
                                                jurisdiction. These locations may have less protective laws than your
                                                own. If you do not want your information to be transferred or processed
                                                outside your country or jurisdiction, please do not use the
                                                Services.
6.Children's
                                                Policy
We prioritize the
                                                protection of children's information. Our services are not intended for
                                                children, and we do not actively collect personal data from minors
                                                without parental or legal guardian permission. If a parent or guardian
                                                discovers that their child has provided us with information without
                                                consent, they should contact us immediately. We will take reasonable
                                                steps to delete such information from our records.
7.For individuals in
                                                the European Economic Area
This section applies
                                                only to individuals accessing or using our Services located in the
                                                European Economic Area.
When you use our
                                                services, you have the following rights:
7.1 Right to be
                                                Informed: The right to know what personal data is being processed, why,
                                                and who else the data may be shared with.
7.2 Right of Access:
                                                The right to see what data is held about you by a Data
                                                Controller.
7.3 Right to
                                                Rectification: The right to have your data corrected or amended if it is
                                                incorrect.
7.4 Right to Erasure:
                                                The right to request the deletion of personal data under certain
                                                circumstances, such as when it is no longer needed for its original
                                                purpose.
7.5 Right to Restrict
                                                Processing: The right to request a temporary halt to the processing of
                                                personal data, such as during a dispute.
7.6 Right to Data
                                                Portability: The right to request data supplied directly to the Data
                                                Controller to be provided in a structured, commonly used, and
                                                machine-readable format.
7.7 Right to Object:
                                                The right to object to further processing of your data inconsistent with
                                                its original purpose.
7.8 Rights in Relation
                                                to Automated Decision Making and Profiling: The right not to be subject
                                                to a decision based solely on automated processing.
To exercise your rights
                                                under applicable law, please contact us at
longseagamesup@outlook.com
.
                                                Please note that when we receive your personal rights request, we may
                                                verify your identity to ensure the security of your personal
                                                information.
8.For individuals in
                                                California
This section applies
                                                only to individuals accessing or using our Services located in
                                                California.
The following
                                                rights apply to individuals covered by the California Consumer Privacy
                                                Act (“CCPA”):
8.1 Right to Know: You
                                                have the right to know what personal data is being collected about you
                                                and how it is used and shared.
8.2 Right to Deletion:
                                                You have the right to request the deletion of your personal data. Please
                                                note that such deletion may result in us no longer being able to provide
                                                you with our Services.
8.3 Right to Opt Out:
                                                You have the right to opt out of the sale of your personal data.
8.4 Right to
                                                Non-Discrimination: You have the right not to be discriminated against
                                                for exercising any of these rights or other rights under the
                                                CCPA.
8.5 Right to Withdraw
                                                Consent: You have the right to withdraw your consent on which processing
                                                is based at any time.
To exercise your rights
                                                under applicable law, please contact us at
longseagamesup@outlook.com
.
                                                Please note that when we receive your personal rights request, we may
                                                verify your identity to ensure the security of your personal
                                                information.
9.Contact
If you have any
                                                questions or suggestions about this Privacy Policy while using our
                                                products or services, or if you believe that your personal information
                                                is not being protected as outlined in this Privacy Policy, you may
                                                contact us at:
longseagamesup@outlook.com
.
Appendix A
Privacy Policy -
                                                        Mintegral
Pangle End User Data
                                                        Privacy Policy | Pangle
Privacy Policy |
                                                        MobileFuse
Meta
Privacy
                                                        Policy
LINE Privacy
                                                        Center
Privacy Policy —
                                                        FYBER
Inmobi
Vungle
UnityAds
Privacy Policy |
                                                        ironSource
Privacy Policy | Legal
                                                        | Chartboost Documentation
Max
                                                        (Applovin)
Admob
Smaato
BidMachine
Privacy |
                                                        PubMatic
Privacy Policy | Verve
                                                        Therapeutics
Ogury
Privacy Policy -
                                                        Amazon Publisher Services
Yandex
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.mintegral.com/en/privacy:
PRIVACY POLICY
Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services
Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website
PRIVACY POLICY
September 14
th
2024
Mintegral entities (for purpose of applicable data protection laws, Mintegral entities providing Mintegral Service which are subject to applicable disclosure requirements can be viewed
HERE
collectively, “Mintegral”, or “we”, “us”, “our”) provide this privacy policy to explain how we collect, use, and share information. This privacy policy (“Policy”) covers Mintegral’s handling of two types of information:
(1)Information we receive when we provide our service, including (i) device information about end users we collect through our software development kit (“SDK”), application programming interface (“API”), our platforms, services or technologies from traffic supply partners such as mobile app developer, ad exchange platform, supply-side platform, mediation platform; (ii) information about end users’ interaction with ads collect through our SDK, API or other technologies, or collected and transferred to us by our Business Partners (e.g. mobile app developers, advertisers, hereinafter referred to as “Business Partners”) or any third party designated by them; (iii) device information generated during end users’ use of our Business Partners’ mobile apps, websites, platforms or services and information collected and transferred to us by our Business Partners or any third party designated by them; (iv) information provided by Business Partners when they use Mintegral’s platforms, technologies, services. In the Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services, the end users mentioned in this section are collectively referred to as “User”, “you” or “your”; the SDK, API, any technology, platform or service provided by Mintegral mentioned in this section are referred to as “Mintegral Service”.
Please click on the following link to access detail about
Protection for Minors
under the process of collecting this type of information
.
(2)Information we receive through the following websites from website visitors (hereinafter referred to as “Visitors”, “you” or “your”) in the Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website: (i) our website at:
www.mintegral.com
www.mintegral.net
or any other website on which this Policy is posted, as well as (ii) any website we provide to Business Partners or potential clients in order to provide our services.
Please click on the following link to access detail about
Protection of Minors
under the process of collecting this type of information.
This Policy is subject to any service agreement between Mintegral and you. By using the Mintegral Service or Mintegral Site, you acknowledge that you have read, understood and agreed to this Policy. Please review this Policy before using the Mintegral Service or the Mintegral Site.
We evaluate this Policy and procedures to implement improvements and refinements from time to time.We will review and update this Privacy Policy as necessary at least every 12 months.
Data protection and ensuring our Business Partners’ and your trust is at the core of Mintegral’s business principles. Accordingly, being compliance with applicable data protection laws is our top priority and this Policy is updated to be compliance with the applicable data protection laws, including but not limited to the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”),
the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais) (“LGPD”), the any personal information protection law announced by Chinese governments
(“PIPL”)
, and
the US States Privacy Laws
(
“
US States Privacy Laws
”
)
including
California Customer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act ("VCDPA")
,
the Colorado Privacy Act
(
“CPA”
), t
he Utah Consumer Privacy Act
(
“UCPA”
),
the Connecticut Data Protection Act
(
“CDPA”
),
the
Oregon Consumer Privacy Act (“OCPA”)
, and
the Texas Data Privacy and Security Act (“TDPSA”)
.
For the purpose of this Policy, “Processor” means an “entrusted handler” under the PIPL, a “processor” under the
US States Privacy Laws, excluding CCPA
, and a “service provider” under the CCPA. “Controller” means a “personal information handler” under the PIPL, a “controller” under the
US States Privacy Laws, excluding CCPA
, and a “business” under the CCPA.
Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services
1. Introduction
This Policy describes Mintegral’s information collection and use while (i) Users view ads served by the Mintegral Services or interact with Mintegral’s Services in any manner; (ii) Users interact with platforms, applications, websites or other services provided by Business Partners; (iii) Business Partners interact with Mintegral’s Service.
Except as explicitly stated in this Policy, Mintegral acts as a Controller under the GDPR when processing Users' personal information in the provision of Mintegral Services.
Our technology enables our partners to show Users more relevant advertising that is based on Users’ interests and behaviors. In order to provide Mintegral Services, we may collect and use certain information about User activity and preferences. We understand how important it is to keep such User’s personal information confidential and discrete, especially in today’s online world. To this end, we have designed this Policy in a format that is easy to navigate and read so that our privacy practices can be clearly understood.
The Mintegral Services may link to third party websites, Apps or other third party content. Please note that we cannot control the treatment of a User’s information by such third parties, and that the privacy practices of third parties likely differ from those described in this Policy.
2. How We Collect Users’ Information
Depending on the nature of a User’s interaction with the Mintegral Services, or any service provided by Mintegral’s Business Partners, we may collect information directly from such User or from our Business Partners (e.g. mobile application developers, ad exchange platforms, supply-side platform and advertisers). For example, (1) we may collect user information through SDK embedded in mobile apps; (2) our Business Partners such as ad exchange platform and supply-side platform may share user information with us when they initiates an ad request to our DSP; (3) our advertisers or their third-party attribution platforms may share user information with us.
Therefore, in the process of providing Mintegral's services, we have no direct contact with users. We will obtain authorized consent from users regarding the collection and use of personal information through Mintegral's business partners (e.g., mobile application developers or advertisers). In our cooperation agreements with Mintegral's business partners, we have required them to commit to and guarantee the legitimacy of the data source, and they will inform users of the specifics of our processing of personal information as required by applicable law and obtain valid consent from users (obtaining separate consent as required by applicable law if necessary), and guarantee that users can revoke such consent at any time.
3. Information We May Collect From Users
When you view ads served by Mintegral Service or interact with services provided by Mintegral’s Business Partners, we and/or our Business Partners may collect your information.
(1) The information we collect through our SDK may include the following types：
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Avertising ID:
IMEI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, GAID
,
Ama
zon
ID
or MAC address
. We will not collect such information if you restrict your device or the app from acquiring device ID or advertising ID according to Article 7 of this Policy.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of battery, device volume and font size, whether the it is an emulator, information of network, information of hardware, information of device sensor, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status, system boot time, device user name, information of storage capacity;
④
Application Information:
package name of the app of Mintegral’s Business Partners, whether it is downloaded from App Store, version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with Mintegral’s Service, SDK version, list of installed apps*;
Notes: For Users of Android device in Mainland China, after our SDK receives an ad offer from Advertisers/DSPs, we may check if you have installed the app promoted by our ad before showing this ad to you, and if you have already installed the app, we will not show this ad to you (“Impression-Filter”), and we will inform the service end not to serve this ad when the ad request is sent by your device in the future. Mintegral only collects information related to the ad which is Impression-Filtered, and Mintegral does not collect any other information related to any installed application.
⑤
Interactive Information:
when you view ads served by us or have other interaction with ads served by us, we may collect information about your interaction with such ads, for example, information that you have viewed or clicked an ad.
⑥
Others:
timestamp, device event information such as crashes, system activity, the date and time of your request and referral URL, user-agent.
(2)
When you install and use the product (e.g. app) after you view and click an ad served by us, we may collect information
f
rom a
dvertis
ers o
r
the
ir
att
rib
ution
mea
s
urem
ent
partn
ers
in
clu
ding
the fol
l
owin
g t
y
pes:
① Location information: IP address, country, city;
② Device/advertising ID: IMEI, OAID, IDFV, IDFA, GAID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address;
③ Device information: device manufacturer, device model, device operating system information, device language, device type, device network information, device operator;
④ Application information: application version;
⑤ Usage data: timestamp of when the installation event other other event occurred;
⑥ Other information: user agent.
TCF string.
Special note: The TCF string is a machine-readable string defined by IAB Europe that encodes your consent choices regarding the processing of your personal information by us. For more information about the TCF string, you can visit the
IAB Europe website
. Please note that we only collect your TCF string information when you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”).
We may also collect the following information from the mediation platforms that the advertiser works with:
① Location information: IP address, country, city;
② Device/advertising ID: IMEI, OAID, IDFV, IDFA, GAID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address;
③ Device information: device manufacturer, device model, device operating system information, device language, device type, device network information, device operator;
④ Application information: application package name;
⑤ Usage data: timestamp of the occurrence of the monetization event;
⑥ Other information: user agent.
(3) Where Mintegral acts as Demand Side Platform (“DSP”), the ad exchange platform or supply-side platform may share with us your personal information through API may include the following:
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Advertising ID:
IMEI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, Mobile Ad Identifier such as Apple IDFA or Google Advertising ID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of network, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status;
④
Application Information:
version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with the Mintegral Services, user-agent;
⑤
Interactive Information:
we may also collect information about your interaction with ads served by us, such as information that you have viewed or clicked an ad;
⑥
Others:
other information transferred by the ad exchange platform or supply-side platform.
We cooperates with reputational ad exchange platforms and supply-side platform including Google Doubleclick Ad Exchange. The ad exchange platforms or the supply-side platform may receive an ad request containing your personal information and, to the extent permitted by applicable law or with User’s valid consent, transfer to Mintegral to build your profile, personalize your ad experience, and serve future ads you may see on the internet.
(4) As we provide Mintegral Service for our Business Partners, we may collect name, job title, email address, contact address and the account name and password used to access Mintegral websites, IP address of the individuals using Mintegral services on behalf of such Business Partners.
ABOUT SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION
Sensitive Personal Information refers to personal information that, once leaked or illegally used, will easily lead to infringement of the human dignity or harm to the personal or property safety of a natural person. The scope of sensitive personal information may vary pursuant to different applicable data protection law.
We will not collect your sensitive personal information without your consent. Our Business Partner will transmit or authorize us to process your sensitive personal information after notifying you the necessity of processing your sensitive personal information and the impact of your rights and interests with your consent.
4. How We Use Users’ Personal Information
We use your personal information for the following purpose:
Type
o
f Personal Information
Usage
Device Information
Including all types of personal information described in paragraphs (1) to (3) of Article 3 of this Policy
Basic business functions:
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically send. We use your personal information to display ads on your device through automatic decision making process. We use de-identification techniques and algorithms based on machine learning, model prediction, and more. Ads may be shown to you based on information we legally collected such as the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, your device type and your device status. We may create tag, features and build profile about you and your interest. According to the calculation results of the recommendation algorithm based on the profile, we may show you personalized ads or behavioral ads which are relevant to you and customized to your inferred interests, preferences, approximate locations and other features. Our recommendation algorithm does not identify the true identity of a particular natural person.
We also perform secondary processing of aggregated data in accordance with data security technologies such as de-identification and anonymization, which are commonly implemented in the industry, to form a database of features and tags that cannot identify the true identity of a specific natural person, conduct group analysis, and optimize algorithm training models to better understand and analyze your usage trends and preferences in order to improve the quality of our Mintegral Services and develop our new products.
Extended Business Functions: Your device information will be used to collect information about the cause of application crashes for later crash problem solving.
Contact Information
Including all types of personal information described in paragraphs（4）of Article 3 of this Policy
We may collect and use personal information of Users who are representing our Business Partners to use Mintegral Service (e.g. employees of publishers or advertisers) for purpose of business contact and direct marking (e.g. sending marketing emails).
Sensitive Personal Information
/
We will not collect your sensitive personal information without your consent. Our Business Partners will transmit or authorize us to process your sensitive personal information after notifying you the necessity of processing your sensitive personal information and the impact of your rights and interests with your consent.
5. The Legal Basis for Our Processing of Users' Personal Information
(1) Where required by applicable laws, We have contractually agreed that our Business Partners (e.g. developer of mobile app integrated with Mintegral’s SDK, advertisers) will obtain consent of a user or their employees for and on our behalf for our processing of his/her personal information described in this Privacy Policy. A data subject can withdraw their consent at any time.
(2) According to the laws and regulations, the following are exceptions to obtaining the consent of the user:
① Necessary for the conclusion and performance of a contract with the data subject;
② Necessary to fulfill our legal obligations;
③ Necessary to respond to a public health emergency, or to protect the life, health, and property of the data subject in an emergency;
④For the implementation of news reporting, public opinion monitoring and other acts in the public interest, within a reasonable range of the handling of end-user personal information;
⑤In accordance with the provisions of applicable laws within a reasonable range to process the personal information disclosed by the data subject himself/herself or other personal information which has been lawfully disclosed.
(3) If you are located in the European Economic Area, we may use your personal information based on the "legitimate interests" set forth in the GDPR, in necessary cases. Our legitimate interests include: monitoring and preventing fraudulent activity, remove technical obstacles to system operation and ensuring systems and processes work properly and securely.
6. How We Share, Entrust the Processing, Transfer, Disclose And Transmit Users’ Personal Information
(1)
Sharing
We may share personal information collected by us with third parties for the following purposes and scenarios：
<
vertising agencies, ad attribution service providers, ad demand-side platforms
No.
Type of Third Parties
Information of Third Parties
Type of Information
Processing Purpose and Processing Method
1
Advertisers, advertising agencies, ad attribution service providers, ad demand-side platforms
See the list of Third Parties for details
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Avertising ID:
IMEI, IMSI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, IDFA，GAID，Amazon ID  or MAC address. We will not collect such information if you restrict your device or the app from acquiring device ID or advertising ID according to Article 7 of this Policy.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of battery, device volume and font size, whether the it is an emulator, information of network, information of hardware, information of device sensor, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status, system boot time, device user name, information of storage capacity;
④
Application Information:
package name of the app of Mintegral’s Business Partners, whether it is downloaded from App Store, version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with Mintegral’s Service, SDK version, list of installed apps*;
⑤
Interactive
Information:
when you view ads served by us or have other interaction with ads served by us, we may collect information about your interaction with such ads, for example, information that you have viewed or clicked an ad.
⑥
Others:
user-agent.
①for conducting advertising attribution and settlement with advertisers/advertising agencies. In relation to such processing activities of personal information, Mintegral acts as a Processor on behalf of the advertisers/advertising agencies to process Users' personal information;
②for monitoring the quality of advertising delivery;
③
for performing precise targeting.
2
Mintegral Affiliates
See the list of
Mintegral Affiliates
for details
including all types of personal information described in items (1) to (3) of Article 3 of this Policy
for internal data analysis among our affiliates to improve service quality and provide their clients with analytical services based on aggregate data;
3
See the list of
Mintegral Affiliates
for details
including all types of personal information described in items (4) of Article 3 of this Policy
for promoting the products or services of our affiliates to users.
Except as expressly stated in this Policy, we will not disclose User’s personal information to any third party without User’s consent.
We have agreed with the partners who have direct access to the user that the partner will inform the user of the above-mentioned third party information and obtain the user's separate consent.
We may also share aggregate or anonymous information with other third parties in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
(2)
Entrusted Processing
Type of Third Parties
Information of Third Parties
Type of Information
Processing Purpose and Processing Method
cloud service providers
See the cloud service providers
Including all types of personal information described in Article 3 of this Policy
① for responding to advertising requests;
② for ensuring systems and processes work properly and securely;
③ for purpose of data storage.
Except as expressly stated in this Privacy Policy, we do not entrust other third parties with the processing of Users' personal information.
(3)Assignmenet:
We will not transfer the user's personal information to any company, organization or individual, except in the following cases:
① W
e inform the user in advance of the type, purpose, manner and scope of the transfer of personal information and obtain the user's separate consent;
② In the event of a merger, separation, dissolution, bankruptcy, etc. that requires the transfer of personal information, we will inform the user of the name and contact information of the recipient and request the recipient to continue to perform the obligations of the processor of personal information. If the recipient changes the original purpose or method of processing, we will ask the recipient to obtain the user's consent again.
(4)Public Disclosure
We do not publicly disclose the personal information of end users, except in the following cases:
① After informing the user of the type, purpose, manner and scope of the personal information to be publicly disclosed and obtaining the user's separate consent;
② When compelled by laws, regulations, legal proceedings, litigation or government authorities.
(5) International Transfers
When you are located in the European Econocim Area (“EEA”), personal information collected about you will be transferred to recipients in countries located outside the EEA or can be remotely accessed in countries located outside the EEA, including in countries which may not be decided by the European Commission that it provides an adequate level of protection to personal information. We have followed requirements as set out in applicable law to provide adequate protection to your personal data. To the extent as required by applicable law, our Business Partner will obtain your valid consent to the extent for us to transfer your personal information to recipients including Mintegral’s affiliates and any other recipients as described in this Policy, which are located outside the EEA. You are entitled to withdraw your consent at any time.
Mintegral has entered into EU standard contractual clauses (“Model Contracts”) for intra-group transfers of personal information to its affiliates. You can request a copy of these Model Contracts by submitting your request via email to privacy@mintegral.com
If you are located in the mainland of the People's Republic of China, the personal information we collect about you under this Privacy Policy will be stored in the mainland of the People's Republic of China.
We will not transfer your personal information outside of the mainland of the People's Republic of China. If our business partners transfer your personal information overseas, they shall be solely responsible for fulfilling the compliance obligations related to data transfer. They should inform you of the name or identity, contact information, processing purposes, processing methods, types of personal information, and the ways and procedures for exercising your legal rights towards the overseas recipients. They should obtain your separate consent, fulfill the evaluation process as required by laws and regulations, and meet other conditions specified by applicable laws and regulations.
7. Your Data Rights
If you are in the EEA, you have a right to (subject to a limited number of exceptions as permitted by GDPR): (i) request access to and rectification or erasure of your personal information; (ii) obtain restriction of processing or to object to processing of your personal information; and (iii) ask for a copy of your personal information to be provided to them, or a third party, in a digital format. You also have the right to lodge a complaint about the processing of your personal information with your local data protection authority in the EEA.
If you are residents of the State of California in the United States, you can request the following information about how we have collected and used your personal information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting,  selling or sharing Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we disclose the Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
Access. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
You can ask us to correct inaccuracies of your Personal Information.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination as prohibited by the CCPA.You may (i) submit requests to exercise your California privacy rights described above by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
or send a written document to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222-3 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou City, Guangdong Province, China; (ii) o
pt out of selling or sharing of your data by clicking on the following link:
DO NOT SELL OR SHARE MY DATA
and (iii) submit requests to restrict the use of your sensitive Personal Information by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
.
When you submit a request we will verify your request by the information you provide (e.g. device ID, company email) according to our internal guidelines. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request to know or a request to delete your personal information by providing the authorized agent written permission to do so; and by verifying your own identity with us directly.  We will deny any requests from agents that do not submit proof of authorization. For request metrics as designated by the CCPA, please see
here
.
We have sold (as defined under the CCPA) the following categories of Personal Information to the following categories of third parties: please see column “Type of Information” and column “Type of Third Parties” of the 1
st
line under Article 6(1) (“Sharing”) of this Policy. We do not sell Personal Information of minors under the age of 16 without affirmative authorization.
You can also find a list of the categories of Personal Information that we collect in the
“Information We May Collect From Users”
section above. For details regarding the sources from which we obtain personal information, please see the
“How We Collect Users’ Information”
section above. We collect and use personal information for the business or commercial purposes described in the
“How We Use Users’ Personal Information”
section above.
If you are
(i)
a resident of the State of Virginia in the United States, effective January 1, 2023,
(ii)
a resident of the State of Colorado
in the
United States, effective July 1, 2023,
(iii)
a resident of the State of Connecticut
in the
United States, effective July 1, 2023
,
or
(
iv
)
a resident of the State of
Texas in the
United States, effective July 1, 202
4,
you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the VCDPA,
CPA, CDPA
, and
TDPSA
you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Utah in the United States, effective December 31, 2023, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, or (ii) selling your personal information.
As set forth in the UCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Oregon in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
a. to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
b. to obtain a list of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
c. to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
d. to delete your personal information;
e. to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
f. to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the OCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you have the following rights related to your personal information except when laws and administrative regulations otherwise provide.
(1)Right to be informed, right to decide and right to restrict or refuse processing of your personal information.
(2)Right to access and copy your personal information except in special circumstance provided by law.
(3)Right to request to transfer your personal information to another data handler.
(4)Right to request to revise and supplement your personal information when you notice that the personal information we process is inaccurate or incomplete.
(5)Right to delete your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where the purpose of processing has been achieved or is unable to be achieved, or the personal information is no longer necessary for achieving the purpose of processing;
Where Mintegral ceases the provision of its product or service involved, or the retention period has expired;
Where consent is withdrawn by the User;
Where the processing of personal information by Mintegral is in violation of any law, administrative regulations or any agreement; or
Any other circumstance as provided by law or administrative regulations.
If it is technically difficult to delete the personal information, Mintegral shall cease the processing of the personal information, except for the storage and any necessary measure taken for security protection.
(6)For the algorithmic services we provide, you have the right to select or delete user tags for your personal characteristics used for such services.
(7)You have the right to request an explanation of this Policy.
You can contact us via
privacy@mintegral.com
and request your data rights.
Setting about Personalized Ads
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you can manage Mintegral’s ads your see and set for the personalized ads by clicking
here
.
No matter you are in which country or region, you can opt out personalized ads in the following way:
Guidance of Opt out
You can opt-out from receiving interest-based advertising or behavioural advertising from Mintegral on supported devices following the guideline below.
On an iOS device, if you are using iOS 14.5 or above, you can click on "Ask the App Not to Track" in the app's asking pop-up window or manage your "Tracking" settings in [Settings] - [Privacy] . If you ask the App not to track, Mintegral will not access your advertising identifiers and will not use advertising identifiers to infer your interests or serve advertisements to target devices based on your inferred interests.
On Android devices, your settings may allow you to “Opt out of Interest-Based Ads.” When you opt out using this setting on a device, Mintegral will not use information collected from that device to infer your interests or serve ads to that device that are targeted based on your inferred interests.
You can also manage your personalized advertising settings by clicking on the [Settings] section of the mobile app you have downloaded to find privacy-related settings. If you choose not to allow personalized advertising, Mintegral will not use information collected from your device to infer your interests or serve ads to target devices based on inferred interests.
Your mobile web browser may also provide a “Do Not Track” browser setting. When you have enabled this setting in your browser, Mintegral will not use mobile web browsing information from that browser to infer your interests or serve ads to that device that are targeting based on your inferred interests.
8. Security of Users’ Personal Information
The security of User’s information is our utmost priority, and we take strict measures in order to protect our data from unauthorized access, use, disclosure or destruction of data. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative security measures for the Services that comply with applicable laws and industry standards. For example, we use firewalls, encryption technology and other automated software designed to protect against fraud and identity theft; our data is only stored in centers that provide high-level security for User’s information. Physical access is strictly controlled both at the perimeter and at building ingress points by our staff utilizing video surveillance and other electronic means. We will establish a dedicated security team, security management system, and data security process to safeguard the security of your personal information. We adopt a strict data use and access system to ensure that only authorized personnel have access to your personal information, and conduct security audits of data and technology when appropriate. We will develop emergency handling plans and activate them immediately in the event of a user information security incident, in an effort to prevent the expansion of the impact and consequences of such security incidents. Once a user information security incident (leakage, loss, etc.) has occurred, we will promptly inform you in accordance with the requirements of laws and regulations.
We also protect User’s privacy by seeking to minimize the amount of sensitive data that we store on our servers in the first place. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their treatment of user data.
At present, Mintegral programmatic interactive advertising platform has passed the national information security level protection (Level 3) assessment and record, and passed the international authoritative ISO27001 information security certification and SOC 2 Type 1 and Type 2 audits. mintegral also passed the ePrivacy privacy protection certification of the famous European privacy protection certification agency Mintegral has also been certified by the kidSAFE Seal Program under the U.S. Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, which means that Mintegral's programmatic interactive advertising platform is certified as compliant with GDPR regulations and effective in safeguarding user privacy. Mintegral has been certified by TrustArc, an authoritative privacy and security certification authority, as compliant with CPPA requirements for Mintegral's handling of customer and end-user personal data, further demonstrating that Mintegral's services provide comprehensive privacy protection for customers and end-device users. Users provide comprehensive privacy protection.
Mintegral participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies, Mintegral’s identification number within the framework is [Vendor ID: 867].
Mintegral may retain the information relating to you collected from our Business Partners as necessary for the provision of the services, internal analytical purposes, or to comply with its legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce agreements (e.g. settlement). We will only keep your personal information for as long as necessary and in any event in relation to personal information collected by us according to this Policy we will only keep this personal information for no more than two (2) years. The criteria used to determine the retention periods include: (i) how long the personal data is needed to provide the services and operate the business; (ii) the type of personal data collected; and (iii) whether we are subject to a legal, contractual or similar obligation to retain the data (e.g., mandatory data retention laws, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data that must be retained for the purposes of litigation or disputes).
9. Protection for Minors
Mintegral’s service is not mainly for minors. If a User is deemed as minor under applicable law, please make sure that before the use of the application which integrates Mintegral’s product or service or the application of an advertiser that partners with Mintegral for delivering its ads, parents or other guardian and such User have together read the application’s privacy policy with the guardianship and guiding of parents or other guardian, and their consent have been provided for processing of personal information.
We process minor’s personal information according to requirements of related laws and regulations. Except as otherwise provided by law, we will only collect, use, store, disclose, or make available to the public the personal information where permitted by law, with consent of parents or other guardians, or for the necessity of protection of the minors. If we notice the collection of personal information of minors without verifiable consent of parents, we will take measures to delete related information as soon as possible.
If you are parents or other guardian of minors, please contact us via the email we provide in this Policy when you have any question regarding to the protection of minors.
If you are Users in the U.S., we ensure that we comply with COPPA. If our business partners (such as Publishers) operate apps directed to children under the age of thirteen (13) or knowingly collect, use or disclose personal information of children under the age of thirteen (13) during our cooperation, they will obtain verifiable parental consent for Mintegral to collect, use or disclose such personal information according to this Policy. Further, such business partners must enable the COPPA settings when using the Mintegral Services. This allows Mintegral to ensure that any persistent identifiers collected about Users of apps that are flagged as “child-directed” will be processed according to the requirements of COPPA, including not being used to serve behaviorally-targeted ads or track users for such purposes in violation of COPPA. In addition, we will not knowingly collect any other personal information (such as the precise geo-location of Users’ devices) from Users of Apps that we know to be directed to children under the age of thirteen (13).
If you are Users in California U.S.,we ensure that we comply with CCPA. We will not sell or conduct targeted advertising with the data of consumers under the age of 16, unless there is explicit opt-in consent. If the request for consent is declined, we will not ask again for 12 months. Minors under the age of 13 must get permission from a parent or guardian to opt-in.
If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with information without their consent, he or she should promptly contact us and we take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is deleted from our files.
10. Marketing
If you are our Business Partners, we or our affiliates may contact you periodically by e-mail to provide information regarding our products, services and content that may be of interest to you. If applicable law requires that we receive your consent before we send you certain types of marketing communications, we will only send you those types of communications after receiving your consent.
If you decide at any time that you no longer wish to receive such communications from us, you may follow the unsubscribe instructions provided in any of the communications or request to be opted-out of receiving such communications via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
11. Contact Us
If you are located in mainland China, you can (i) send a written request to privacy@mintegral.com or send written documents to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, China.
If you are located outside mainland China, you can (i) contact our DPO by sending a written request to privacy@mintegral.com. You can also contact our data protection representative in the EEA, Eurocore B.V., with address: Hullenbergweg 278, 1101BV Amsterdam.
Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website
1. Introduction
This Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website applies to information collection and use including while you are visiting and using the Mintegral Site. According to the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Mintegral is the data controller of your personal information.
2. What Information We Collect
As you navigate through this Mintegral Site, we may collect information include:
(1)
personal information you voluntarily provide (for example, names, birth dates, numbers or copies of your personal ID card/passport/social security card/driver's license/other license, addresses, telephone numbers, E-mail addresses, occupations, education, work experience, account log-in information, debit or credit card or other payment account information and related information).
Among them, numbers or copies of your personal ID card/passport/social security card/driver's license/other license may constitute sensitive personal information under the definition of CCPA; debit or credit card or other collection account information may constitute sensitive personal information under the definition of CCPA and China Personal Information Protection Law.
(2) s
ome information that are not voluntarily provided such as your browser type, domain name, IP address, pages visited, and the length of your user session using various technologies and means, such as Internet Protocol Address, cookies, Internet Tags and navigational data collection.
Mintegral is entitled to take measures to validate the authenticity of personal information you provide.
If you give us personal information of somebody else, you should warrant that you have gained their permission to do so.
If you are located in mainland China, we may use the Baidu Statistics Service provided by Baidu.com to help us analyze our website usage and help improve the quality of our website services. For more information about the information collected by Baidu's statistical services and its data processing activities, please visit:
Here
If you are located outside of mainland China, We may also use Google Analysis that assists us with analysing the usage of our website and help to improve the service quality of our website. For the personal information that may be collected by Google Analysis and its processing activities, please visit:
Here
3. How We Use Your Information
Based on your consent or based on our legitimate interests, we may use your personal information for the following purposes: (i) to provide you with Mintegral’s products or services or information; (ii) to sign you up for an event or training; (iii) to contact you and respond to your requests and enquiries; (iv) for business administration, including statistical analysis; (v) to personalize your visit to the Mintegral Site and to assist you while you use the Site; (vi) to improve the Mintegral Site by helping us understand who uses the Site; or (vii) to periodically provide you with information about our products and services and content that may be of interest to you by email.
If you decide at any time that you no longer wish to receive such communications from us, you may follow the unsubscribe instructions provided in any of the emails or request to be opted-out of receiving such communications via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
4. Disclosure of Your Personal Information
Subject to compliance with applicable laws and regulations, we may disclose User’s personal information to
Mintegral’s Affiliates
and other third parties.
We may use
Third-party Technology Service Providers
to provide us with services who may have access to your personal information, including
companies
that assist with technical aspects of hosting and operating the Mintegral Site, technical service provider  that assists with analyzing the usage of our website, or email service provider.
(please see our
Cookies Policy
for details).
Except as expressly stated in this Policy, according to the Personal Information Protection Law of the People's Republic of China, we will not disclose User’s personal information to any third party without User’s consent.
We may also share aggregate or anonymous information with other third parties in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
We may disclose users' personal information to our affiliates for the purposes set out in this Policy or to promote the products or services of our affiliates to users.
The servers used in the operation of the Mintegral Site automatically identify a computer by its IP address. Although, we will not be able to identify the computer using its IP address once you have left the Mintegral Site. If we, in good faith, determine that you have or are attempting to misuse or harm the Site, we may investigate and cooperate with appropriate law enforcement agencies to protect our rights or property.
Similarly, we may share your personal information as required or permitted by law to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process or government request, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is legally required or otherwise necessary to protect our rights and property, or the rights, property or safety of others, including to advisers, law enforcement agencies, judicial and regulatory authorities. We may also transfer your personal information to a third party that acquires all or part of our assets or shares, or that succeeds us in carrying on all or a part of our business, whether by merger, acquisition, reorganization or otherwise.
5. International Transfers
When you are located in the European Econocim Area (“EEA”), personal information collected about you will be transferred to recipients in countries located outside the EEA or can be remotely accessed in countries located outside the EEA, including in countries which may not be decided by the European Commission that it provides an adequate level of protection to personal information. We have followed requirements as set out in applicable law to provide adequate protection to your personal data. To the extent as required by applicable law, our Business Partner will obtain your valid consent
to the extent for us to transfer your personal information to recipients including Mintegral’s affiliates and any other recipients as described in this Policy, which are located outside the EEA.
You are entitled to withdraw your consent at any time.
Mintegral has entered into EU standard contractual clauses (
“Model Contracts”
) for intra-group transfers of personal information to its affiliates. You can request a copy of these Model Contracts by submitting your request via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
If you are located in the mainland areas of China, we store your personal information inside the mainland areas of China.
We will not transfer your personal information outside of the mainland areas of China.
6. Your Data Rights
You have the right to access, modify, correct or delete any personal data which we may have collected. To exercise this right please contact privacy
privacy@mintegral.com
If you are in the EEA, you have a right to (subject to a limited number of exceptions): (i) request access to and rectification or erasure of your personal information; (ii) obtain restriction of processing or to object to processing of your personal information; and (iii) ask for a copy of your personal information to be provided to them, or a third party, in a digital format. You also have the right to lodge a complaint about the processing of your personal information with your local data protection authority in the EEA.
If you are residents of the State of California in the United States, you can request the following information about how we have collected and used your personal information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling or sharing Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we disclose the Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
Access. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
You can ask us to correct inaccuracies of your Personal Information.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination as prohibited by the CCPA.You may (i) submit requests to exercise your California privacy rights described above by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
or send a written document to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222-3 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou City, Guangdong Province, China; (ii) opt out of selling
or sharing
of your data by clicking on the following link:
DO NOT SELL OR SHARE MY DATA
and (iii) submit requests to restrict the use of your sensitive Personal Information by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
.
When you submit a request we will verify your request by the information you provide (e.g. device ID, company email) according to our internal guidelines. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request to know or a request to delete your personal information by providing the authorized agent written permission to do so; and by verifying your own identity with us directly.  We will deny any requests from agents that do not submit proof of authorization. For request metrics as designated by the CCPA, please see
here
.
For clarity, we do not sell or share (as defined under the CCPA) your Personal Information.
You can also find a list of the categories of Personal Information that we collect and details regarding the sources from which we obtain Personal Information in the “
What Information We Collect
” section above. We collect and use personal information for the business or commercial purposes described in the “
How We Use Your Personal Information
” section above.
If you are (i) a resident of the State of Virginia in the United States, effective January 1, 2023, (ii) a resident of the State of Colorado in the United States, effective July 1, 2023, (iii) a resident of the State of Connecticut in the United States, effective July 1, 2023, or (iv) a resident of the State of Texas in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us:
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the VCDPA,
CPA, CDPA
, and
TDPSA
you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Utah in the United States, effective December 31, 2023, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, or (ii) selling your personal information.
As set forth in the UCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com.
If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com.
If you are a resident of the State of Oregon in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to obtain a list of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the OCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you have the following rights related to your personal information except when laws and administrative regulations otherwise provide.
(1)Right to be informed, right to decide and right to restrict or refuse processing of your personal information.(2)Right to access and copy your personal information except in special circumstance provided by law.(3)Right to request to transfer your personal information to another data handler.(4)Right to request to revise and supplement your personal information when you notice that the personal information we process is inaccurate or incomplete.(5)Right to delete your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where the purpose of processing has been achieved or is unable to be achieved, or the personal information is no longer necessary for achieving the purpose of processing;
Where Mintegral ceases the provision of its product or service involved, or the retention period has expired;
Where consent is withdrawn by the User;
Where the processing of personal information by Mintegral is in violation of any law, administrative regulations or any agreement; or
Any other circumstance as provided by law or administrative regulations.
If it is technically difficult to delete the personal information, Mintegral shall cease the processing of the personal information, except for the storage and any necessary measure taken for security protection.
(6)You have the right to request an explain of this Policy.
You can contact us via
privacy@mintegral.com
and request your data rights.
7. Security of Your Personal Information
The security of User’s information is our utmost priority, and we take strict measures in order to protect our data from unauthorized access, use, disclosure or destruction of data. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative security measures for the Services that comply with applicable laws and industry standards. For example, we use firewalls, encryption technology and other automated software designed to protect against fraud and identity theft; our data is only stored in centers that provide high-level security for User’s information. Physical access is strictly controlled both at the perimeter and at building ingress points by our staff utilizing video surveillance and other electronic means.
We also protect User’s privacy by seeking to minimize the amount of sensitive data that we store on our servers in the first place. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their treatment of user data.
We will only keep your personal information for as long as necessary and in any event in relation to personal information collected by us on the Site we will only keep this personal information for one (1) year. For personal information collected via Google Analytics the following retention periods apply:
Here
8. Protection of Minors
The Site does not knowingly collect any personal information from minors. The personal information of any minor you provide shall be agreed by the minor’s parent or guardian in advance. Minor is defined in accordance with the laws applicable to this Policy of Mintegral Website.
We process minor’s personal information according to requirements of related laws and regulations. Except as otherwise provided by law, we will only collect, use, store, disclose, or make available to the public the personal information where permitted by law, with consent of parents or other guardians, or for the necessity of protection of the minors. If we notice the collection of personal information of minors without verifiable consent of parents, we will take measures to delete related information as soon as possible.
If you are parents or other guardian of minors, please contact us via the email we provide in this Policy when you have any question regarding to the protection of minors.
If you are Users in the U.S., we ensure that we comply with COPPA. If our business partners (such as Publishers) operate apps directed to children under the age of thirteen (13) or knowingly collect, use or disclose personal information of children under the age of thirteen (13) during our cooperation, they will obtain verifiable parental consent for Mintegral to collect, use or disclose such personal information according to this Policy. Further, such business partners must enable the COPPA settings when using the Mintegral Services. This allows Mintegral to ensure that any persistent identifiers collected about Users of apps that are flagged as “child-directed” will be processed according to the requirements of COPPA, including not being used to serve behaviorally-targeted ads or track users for such purposes in violation of COPPA. In addition, we will not knowingly collect any other personal information (such as the precise geo-location of Users’ devices) from Users of Apps that we know to be directed to children under the age of thirteen (13).
If you are Users in California U.S.,we ensure that we comply with CCPA. We will not sell or conduct targeted advertising with the data of consumers under the age of 16, unless there is explicit opt-in consent. If the request for consent is declined, we will not ask again for 12 months. Minors under the age of 13 must get permission from a parent or guardian to opt-in.
If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with information without their consent, he or she should promptly contact us and we take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is deleted from our files.
9. Use of Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Mintegral may use cookies or other technology (collectively “Cookies”) to collect certain information about you when you are visiting the Site. Please read our
Cookies Policy
for more details.
10. Outside Sites and Linking
The Site may contain links and pointers to other sites on the Internet that are owned or operated by third party vendors and other third parties (the “
Outside Sites
“). Mintegral is not responsible for the availability of, or the content located on or through, any Outside Site, including any webcasting or other form of transmission received from any Outside Sites. You should contact the site administrator or Webmaster for those Outside Sites if you have any concerns regarding such links or the content located on such Outside Sites. Mintegral permits certain third party links to the home page of its Site, provided that Mintegral is provided with notice of such links and does not thereafter object to such linking. Mintegral a reserves the right to revoke unilaterally any consent that it may at any time give to any linkage, including linkages to the home page. The Outside Sites are being provided to you only as a convenience and any link or pointer contained on this Site does not imply endorsement of the Outside Sites.
11. Copyright
All Site content, design, text, graphics, images, logos, buttons, icons, interfaces, audio and video clips, and the selection and arrangements thereof are the exclusive property of Mintegral, or its respective content providers, and are protected by Hong Kong SAR and international copyright laws. All software used on the Site is the property of Mintegral or its respective software suppliers, and such software is protected by Hong Kong SAR and international copyright laws and other applicable laws and treaties. Users of this Site shall not transmit/post any information to this Site that infringes the copyright or other intellectual property rights of others.
12. Trademarks
All trademarks, service marks and trade names used on the Site (collectively the “Marks“) are solely owned by Mintegral. The Marks may not be used in connection with any product or service that is not a product or service of Mintegral or that is likely to cause confusion among customers, or that in any manner disparages or discredits Mintegral.
13. Online Conduct
Any conduct by a person that in Mintegral ‘s sole discretion restricts or inhibits any other person from using or enjoying the Site, is prohibited. You agree to use the Site only for lawful purposes and in accordance with that prohibition. You agree that you will not post on the Site or transmit any unlawful, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, sexually explicit, profane, hateful, racially, ethnically, or otherwise objectionable material of any kind, including, but not limited to, any material that encourages conduct that would constitute a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability or otherwise violate any applicable local, state, national, or international law.
14. Termination of Usage
Mintegral may, without incurring any liability to you, terminate access by you or suspend any access to all or part of the Site, without notice, for any conduct that Mintegral, in its sole discretion, believes is in violation of any applicable law or this Agreement, or is harmful to the interests of another user, a third-party, a merchant, a sponsor, a licensor, a service provider, or the Site.
Due to the rapidly evolving technologies on the Internet, we may occasionally update this Policy. All revisions will be posted to this website
www.mintegral.com
15. Contact Us
If you are located in mainland China, you can (i) send a written request to privacy@mintegral.com or send written documents to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, China.
If you are located outside mainland China, you can (i) contact our DPO by sending a written request to privacy@mintegral.com. You can also contact our data protection representative in the EEA, Eurocore B.V., with address: Hullenbergweg 278, 1101BV Amsterdam.
Contact Mintegral
boost your mobile growth
如您是中国大陆用户，请点击按钮切换网页站点，以获得更好的浏览体验
确定
By clicking “Agree”, you agree to our use of tools to send you marketing information and to record and analyse your browsing behaviors. For more details, please see "Customise Settings".
Agree
Customise Settings
Sub-policy 1
https://www.pangleglobal.com/zh/privacy/enduser-en:
首页
/
协议条款
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Pangle Publisher Agreement
Pangle Publisher Agreement
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy applies to personal data that we process through Pangle (as defined below), where you interact with Pangle through mobile applications and/or websites that have integrated with Pangle s advertising platform either directly or via an advertising exchange, each a “Partner”. The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy will apply to the processing of your personal data in your capacity as an end user.
Last updated: 8 March 2023
I. Who we are and who this applies to
I.1 We are Bytedance Pte. Ltd., a company incorporated in Singapore whose registered office is at 1 Raffles Quay, #26-10 ,Singapore 048583 (" we", "our" or " us"). This Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy ("Privacy Policy") explains who we are, how we collect, process, store, use, transfer, share, and disclose ("process") personal data about you, and how you can exercise your data privacy rights.
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all consent necessary for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
I.3 If you have any questions or concerns about our processing of your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this Privacy Policy.
II. What is Pangle?
II.1 Pangle is a mobile advertising platform, including support systems and services operated by Bytedance and accessible via www.pangleglobal.com ("Pangle"). Pangle enables advertisers to serve advertisements on third party mobile applications and/or websites owned or operated by a Partner or to which a Partner has the right to serve advertising (each a“Partner Site”). We do this by processing certain information collected from those Partner Sites, as described in this Privacy Policy.
III. What personal data we process
III.1 The types of personal data that we process depend on the circumstances of collection and on the nature of the services requested or transaction undertaken for our Partners.
III.2 When you interact with a Partner Site, we process certain information about you and your device. This information may be collected automatically from your device using our software code (referred to as a "software development kit", or "SDK"), or shared with us by other advertising exchanges (e.g. Google DoubleClick). We also use cookies (text files inserted in your browser when you visit our partners or customers' mobile applications and websites) and other tracking technologies available on your device.
III.3 The information that we process about you may include some or all of the following categories:
a. Information obtained automatically from your device
i. Identifiers: We may process device-specific identifiers such as your IP address, mobile advertising identifier (such as the "Google Advertising ID" on Android phones or the "ID for Advertisers" on iOS devices), or a Pangle-specific identifier which our SDK has assigned to your device. A mobile advertising identifier is an identifier that is provided by your device operating system and allows companies, like Pangle, to recognize your device across apps for advertising purposes. In addition to the mobile advertising identifier, and other similar technologies, Pangle may also obtain your device's model, operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), your device's language settings, general geographic region, time zone, network type (such as 5G or WiFi), your ROM version, screen resolution (to know which ads which will appear best on your device), mobile country code and mobile network code, and the time your device was last updated and started.
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have your consent or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
iii. Internet activity: We may process information about your app and website usage, including the name and version of the app or website that has integrated Pangle. We may also process information about your interactions with any advertisements we deliver (e.g. information about the advertisements served, viewed, or clicked on, such as the type of ad, where and when the ad was served, whether you clicked on it, and whether you visited the advertiser s website or downloaded the advertiser s app, as well as any preferences you may have expressed in respect of that advertisement).
b. Information obtained from other sources
i. From time to time, we may receive information about you from other sources. For example, we may receive information about you from third parties, such as advertising exchanges that share data with us for the purposes of serving advertising, if third parties are legally permitted to disclose this information to us.
ii. The information we receive from these sources may include identifiers (such as your IP address or mobile advertising identifier), information about your Internet activity (such as information about your interaction with third party websites, applications and advertisements) and inferences relating to your preferences and characteristics (e.g. your approximate age and gender).
IV.How we use personal data
IV.1 We use personal data to serve you with personalised advertisements and understand the audiences who see the advertisements we serve. Specifically, we process personal data for the following purposes:
a. To serve you advertisements: To enable third party advertisers to bid on and fill advertising space on Partner Apps with their advertising. We use your mobile advertising identifier, together with the other device identifiers described above, to serve you with personalised advertising and for related purposes such as frequency capping (limiting the number of times you see the same ad), attribution (making sure we get paid by advertisers for the advertisements we deliver), and fraud detection (detecting malicious software, or "bots", that generate false interactions with advertisements to drive fraudulent advertising revenues). We also use your device data to ensure we display advertisements that display properly on your device.
b. To personalise the advertisements we show you: To infer your interests from the types of apps you use and the adverts you interact with, as well as to infer certain demographic information about you (such as your age and gender) so we can show you advertisements that are more relevant to you;
c. To serve you advertisements on the basis of your location: To serve you advertisements that are relevant for your region and displayed in the relevant local language, as well as to better understand the audiences who see our advertisements, based on your current or prior location, including through location-based targeting segments created by us or by our third party advertisers.
d. For auditing and reporting: To verify accurate delivery of, and count the number of end users who see and interact with, advertisements we serve on behalf of our advertisers and what ad campaigns led to further consumer activity (such as a purchase, app install or visit) (sometimes called "attribution"). We use this information to report to our advertisers about the advertisements users have seen and interacted with, so that we and our publishers are paid appropriately for the advertisements we display.
e. To provide campaign analytics to advertisers: To provide advertisers information about how well their campaigns perform, whether relative to their prior campaigns, or bench-marked against third party campaigns or other data.
f. For cross-device targeting: To "link" or "resolve" the same user across their various devices (such as across mobile devices, browsers and tablets). For instance, we (or a third party partner we work with) may help an advertiser "find" a consumer they have engaged with previously on a mobile device when that consumer is browsing on their tablet, in order to target ads to the user across those devices.
g. To detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecute those responsible for such activities: For example, to identify invalid clicks (or advertising queries) and protect us and our advertisers from fraudulent behaviour.
h. To verify or maintain the quality of Pangle and improve, upgrade or enhance Pangle: For example, (i) for audit, research, and analysis of the information in order to maintain, improve, upgrade or enhance our advertising services, and to ensure that our technologies function properly; and (ii) other internal operations, such as debugging, support, and security.
i. For compliance with legal obligations: To comply with legal obligations that apply to us, for example to respond to law enforcement requests.
j. For archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes.
k. For any other purpose to which you consent: To use your personal data for any other purpose to which you have provided consent.
IV.2 In general, we will process personal data only for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or for purposes that are explained to you at the time your personal data is collected. However, we may also use your personal data for other purposes that are not incompatible with the purposes we have disclosed to you if and where this is permitted by applicable data protection laws.
V. Who we share your personal data with
V.1 We may share your personal data for the purposes described above in this Privacy Policy with the following categories of recipients:
a Our advertising partners and platforms: We may share personal data with our
advertising partners
(such as DSPs) and partner platforms (such as
TikTok for Business
) in connection with their bidding on the ad opportunity and optimizing their ad bidding systems and ad biddingÅ strategies, so as to target and display advertisements on Publisher Partner Apps on behalf of advertisers.
b. Our advertisers: We also share limited personal data in aggregated form with our advertising partners, through reports about the kinds of people seeing their advertisements and how their advertisements are performing (for example, that an ad was seen by 100 men between the ages of 25 and 34 who live in Singapore and like football). Aggregated data cannot by itself can be used to contact you or identify your name. We also report to our advertising partners which Pangle advertisements resulted in you making a purchase or taking an action with an advertiser.
c. Partners: We share aggregated data with Partners through reports about the types of advertisements served to their apps, in order that they can measure the effectiveness and value of our services. As these reports are aggregated they do not reveal any information that directly identifies you.
d. Our affiliates, corporate group and third party service providers: We share personal data with our affiliates and other companies, including other Bytedance entities, who help us operate our business, perform functions on our behalf or provide services to us, including data processing services to us (for example, to support, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the accuracy, safety and security of our services, or to provide analytics or attribution services to us, as well as service providers who provide technical, customer, hosting, data hygiene and enhancement or operational support), as well as other professional advisors. We may also share personal data with members of our corporate group to improve their ads systems and processes, to help them deliver more relevant ads to you and to reach you on non-Bytedance properties.
e. Our analytics and attribution partners: We share personal data with our analytics and attribution partners who help us monitor the success of our advertising campaigns (such as how many end users saw and clicked on an advertisement) and provide reporting to our advertisers.
f. Any competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party: We may share personal data with these parties where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation; (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights; (iii) to detect and protect against fraud or other security or technical vulnerabilities; (iv) to respond to an emergency; or (v) to otherwise protect your vital interests or those of any other person where permitted by applicable law.
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person with your consent to the disclosure or as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection law.
VI. How we keep your personal data secure
VI.1 We use reasonable technical and organisational measures to protect the personal data that we process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal data.
VII. International data transfers
VII.1 Your personal data may be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are located or in which your personal data was collected. However, we will not transfer or permit any of your personal data to be transferred outside of such country unless we have taken measures necessary to ensure the transfer is in compliance with applicable laws, and in any case to a recipient that has comparable privacy protections in place.
VII.2 Specifically, our servers are located in the United States of America and Singapore, and our group companies and third party service providers and partners operate around the world. This means that we may process your personal data in any of these countries in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
VIII. Data retention
VIII.1 We retain your personal data for as long as it is necessary to provide you with services so that we can fulfil our contractual obligations and exercise our rights in relation to the information involved. Where we do not need your information in order to provide services to you, we retain it only for so long as we have a legitimate business purpose in keeping such data or as necessary to comply with the law.
VIII.2 When we have no ongoing legitimate business or legal need to process your personal data, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives or the law requires otherwise), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
IX. Targeted ads and your right to opt-out
Our partners use the Pangle SDK for the purpose of serving targeted ads to you. To do this, Pangle receives and processes device information such as cookies, mobile advertising identifiers, IP addresses, user agent information and browsing or app data where the SDK is installed. Pangle uses this device information to identify your device and deliver relevant ads to you.
IX.1 Opt-out
You can opt out of ads that are targeted based on data Pangle previously received about you by clicking
Ad label
. Pangle's ability to opt you out of targeted ads depends on our ability to recognize your device. As device and connection information can change frequently, we encourage you to revisit this page periodically to ensure your opt-outs are up to date.
IX.2 Non-targeted ads
If you opt out of targeted ads, Pangle will stop showing ads based on data it previously collected and can link to your device. However, Pangle may still show you ads based on data it receives about the context of the app or website you are visiting (e.g. sports advertisements in a sports app) or your device (ads for iPhone users or Android users).
X. Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. You can request to access, correct, update or delete your personal data by contacting us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below, and we will fulfil your request if these rights are available under applicable data protection laws in your country.
b. You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
X.2 We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. We do not discriminate against any individual based on the exercise of their data protection rights. However, we may request for you to further provide us with your personal information for the purposes of verifying your identity.
XI. Children
XI.1 Where applicable laws prohibit us from processing personal data about children who are under specified age thresholds or require us to obtain parental consent before we may process personal data about such children, then we will not knowingly process personal data about children unless we are in compliance with those laws.
XI.2 If you believe we may be processing personal data relating to children contrary to applicable law, please contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below and we will investigate and, where necessary, take appropriate steps to cease any such processing and delete any such personal data.
XII. Updates to this Privacy Policy
XII.1 This Privacy Policy is effective as of the date set out at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XII.2 We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time, including in response to changing legal, technical or business developments, in accordance with applicable law.
XII.3 You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the "last updated" date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XIII. How to contact us
XIII.1 If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal data, please contact us using the details below.
- For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland: europe_privacy@pangleglobal.com
- For individuals located in any other part of the world: privacy@pangleglobal.com.
- For individuals located in the Americas: americas_privacy@pangleglobal.com
XIV. Language
XIV.1 This Privacy Policy is made in English and translations into other languages may be provided. In the event of any conflict between the English version and any translations, the English version will prevail to the extent permitted by the prevailing laws.
Jurisdiction-specific terms
For individuals located in Israel:
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section III. What personal data we process:
III.4 You are under no legal obligation to provide us any personal data.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section VII. International Data Transfers:
VII.3 You hereby consent to the transfer of your personal data as set out in this Section VII.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section X. Your data protection rights:
X.3 You have the right to appeal the refusal of Pangle to comply with your request to exercise your rights in a court of competent jurisdiction.
For individuals located in Brazil
If you are using the Platform in Brazil, the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
The following paragraph shall replace section I, 1.2. of this Privacy Policy:
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all necessary authorizations for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
The following paragraph shall replace section III.3, a, ii. of this Privacy Policy:
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have proper authorization or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
The following paragraph shall replace section IV, k. of this Privacy Policy:
k. For any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law: To use your personal data for any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section V, g. of this Privacy Policy:
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Exercise of data protection rights. Brazilian law provides certain rights to individuals with regard to their personal data. Thus, we seek to ensure transparency and access controls in order to allow users to benefit from the mentioned rights.
We will respond and/or fulfill your requests for the exercise of your rights below, according to the applicable law and when applicable, to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law - LGPD:
I. confirmation of whether your data are being processed;
II. access to your data;
III. correction of incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data;
IV. anonymization, blocking or erasure of data;
V. portability of personal data to a third party;
VI. object to the processing of personal data. Please note that you can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above;
VII. information of public and private entities with which we shared data;
VIII. information about the possibility to refuse providing personal data and the respective consequences, when applicable;
IX. withdrawal of your consent.
Verifying your identity: For your safety and to allow us to make sure that we do not disclose any of your personal data to unauthorized third parties, in order to verify your identity and guarantee the adequate exercise of your rights, we may request specific information and/or documents from you before we can properly respond to a request received concerning your data. All data and documents received from you in the process of responding to your requests will be used for the strict purposes of analyzing your request, authenticating your identity, and finally responding to your request.
Limitations to your rights: In certain situations, we may have legitimate reasons not to comply with some of your requests. For instance, we may choose not to disclose certain information to you when a disclosure could adversely impact our business whenever there is a risk of violation to our trade secrets or intellectual property rights. In addition, we may refrain from complying with a request for erasure when the maintenance of your data is required for complying with legal or regulatory obligations or when such maintenance is required to protect our rights and interests in case a dispute arises. Whenever this is the case and we are unable to comply with a request you make, we will let you know the reasons why we cannot fulfill your request.
DPO: If you wish to reach the Pangle’s Data Protection Officer, contact us at: dpobrasil@pangleglobal.com
Access Logs. We keep your application access logs, under confidentiality, in a controlled and safe environment, for, at least, 6 (six)  months, in order to comply with legal obligations.
The following paragraph shall be added to section XI. of this Privacy Policy:
Parental and Guardian Consent. If required by Brazilian data protection laws, (i) if you are over the age of 16 but under the age of 18, you can only use and register for an account with the assistance of your parent or legal guardian and you declare and represent that you had such assistance to use the Services and to agree to the Policy; (ii) if you are over the age of 13 but under the age of 16, you can only use and register for an account with the representation of your parent or legal guardian, and you must obtain the consent from your parent or legal guardian to the use of the Services and acceptance of this Privacy Policy; and (iii) if you are under the age of 13 you are not allowed to have an account.
For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland:
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. Opt-out of targeted advertising: You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
b. Access Your Data: You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm we process your personal data and for a copy of your personal data.
c. Delete Your Data: You can ask us to delete all or some of your personal data.
d. Change or Correct Data: You can ask us to change or fix your data.
e. Portability: You can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in a machine-readable for
f. Object or Restrict Use of Data and Withdraw Consent: You can ask us to stop using some or all of your data, e.g. if we have no legal right to keep using it. You can ask us to stop processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes; withdraw your consent or ask us to stop making any automatic individual decisions, including profiling. If you object to such processing, we ask you to share the reason for your objection in order for us to examine the processing of your personal data and to balance our legitimate interest in processing and your objection to this processing.
g. Complain: The right to lodge complaints before the competent data protection regulator.
X.2 For further information, contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below. We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. If you do not provide your personal data, we will not be able to provide some or all of our services to you. If you have made a specific request to us, and do not provide personal data that we can use to identify you (such as a device identifier) we will be unable to fulfil your request. The following paragraph shall be added as section XIV of this Privacy Policy:
XIV. Legal basis
XIV.1 In the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom we must have a legal basis to process your personal data. For users located in these regions, we will only serve targeted adverts to you with your consent. The legal basis for other processing of your personal data will depend on the personal data concerned and the specific context in which we process it. If we process your personal data in our legitimate interests, such as for security and product improvement purposes, this interest will normally be to provide an effective, secure and dynamic platform.
XIV.2 In some cases, we process your data to comply with our legal obligations, with your consent or where it is in the vital interests of you or another person.
XIV.3 If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below.
通过点击“接受Cookies”，即表示您同意我们使用Cookies，并接受
Cookie政策
以增强用户体验
接受Cookies
禁用Cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://mobilefuse.com/privacy-policy:
MOBILE
FUSE
Privacy Policy
MobileFuse Privacy Policy
Last Updated: 06/04/2024
MobileFuse LLC and its affiliates (
“MobileFuse,” “we,” “our,”
or
“us”
) engages with companies, such as app publishers and app developers (“
Client(s)
”), to serve ads on their digital properties through various channels of advertising solutions including exchanges, network, off-network etc.
This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, and share the personal information that we gather on the subdomains and websites of
https://mobilefuse.com/
(“
Sites
”), or that we collect when you contact us directly to become a Client or that we collect directly through our Client's use of our advertising solutions (“
Services
”).
Please click the following links to learn more about our Privacy Policy:
About Us
What Personal Information Do We Collect
How We Use Your Personal Information
How We Share Personal Information
Online Advertising & Cookies
Do-Not-Track Signals
Control Over Your Information
Your Opt-Out Choices
Children
Information Retention and Security
Third Party Websites and Services
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Contact Us
Region-Specific Disclosures
Additional Disclosures for Certain U.S. Residents
Additional Disclosures for the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
1.
About Us
MobileFuse obtains information from various entities. These entities are defined below by what they are referred to in this Privacy Policy and when their information is collected. Entities may overlap and are not exclusive categories.
Website Visitors:
When you visit our Sites or use the Sites to contact us directly for information.
Clients:
When you provide us information to engage our Services.
End Users:
When we collect and process information from individuals on behalf of our Clients.
Service Providers:
When you become a service provider to MobileFuse.
Employees and Applicants:
Through the MobileFuse candidacy process.
The use of “
you
” and “
your
” throughout this Privacy Policy will, depending on the context, refer to a MobileFuse Website Visitor, Client, or End User.
In providing our Services, Clients may collect data in our products and services, or we may collect data on their behalf, which may include personal information or data about End Users (“
User Information
”). Our Clients use User Information to buy and sell advertising space for display on publishers' websites, mobile applications, and other digital media properties (which we collectively refer to as “
Digital Media Properties
”).
MobileFuse as a Data Controller:
For purposes of data protection laws, MobileFuse is the “data controller” (or similar term under applicable laws) and is generally responsible for and controls the processing of your personal information (i) when you visit our websites; (ii) when you sign up for and use our Services, or (iii) when we use personal information for targeted advertising, cross-contextual behavioral advertising, or creating or supplementing user profiles for such purposes, and that personal information does not include a restricted processing signal.
MobileFuse as a Data Processor:
MobileFuse acts as a “data processor” (or similar term under applicable laws), when we process User Information on behalf and under the instruction of the respective Client, who is the data controller. Please refer to the privacy policies of the apps you use to understand how those apps, sites and services collect, use, and share data from your interactions with them. MobileFuse is not responsible for how those third-party apps, sites and services collect and use data.
MobileFuse participates in the IAB Canada Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies.
MobileFuse participates in the IAB Europe and IAB Canada Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies. MobileFuse’s identification number within the framework is 909.
MobileFuse adheres to IAB CCPA Compliance Framework for Publishers & Technology Companies found here:
https://www.iab.com/wp-content/uploads/2019/12/IAB_CCPA-Compliance-Framework-for-Publishers-Technology-Companies.pdf
.
2.
What Personal Information Do We Collect
Information You Give Us.
You may give us information by signing up for an online account, entering information through our online forms or surveys, inputting information while using our Services, or contacting us by phone or email for information or Client Services.
The categories of information include:
Identifiers
, such as real name, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
Categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code
, such as name, address, telephone number, education, employment, or employment history.
Commercial information
, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, such as browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an Internet Web site, application, or advertisement.
Geolocation data
, such as approximate location data generated based on your IP address or other information.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
Professional or employment-related information
, such as the business or organization you represent, your title with that business or organization, and information relating to your role with the business or organization, job application information, and other details contained in your resume.
Education information.
Inferences
drawn from the above categories of information.
User Information Collected on Behalf of Clients.
When you view an advertisement distributed through MobileFuse on a site, app, or other digital media, we may collect information on you, your device, and your interaction with the advertisement. This information enables us to serve advertisements to you, improve our Services including to recognize your device when you use other sites and applications that have partnered with us. MobileFuse may also collect information about you when you elect to interact with our surveys or opinion-based applications. User Information we may collect includes:
(a)
Device identifiers
. Device identifiers are alphanumeric strings that are unique to your device. These include:
iOS devices’ Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) and iOS Identifier for Vendors (IDFV)
Google Advertising ID (GAID), or Android ID for Android devices
Identifier for Advertising on OTT and CTV platforms
International mobile equipment identity (IMEI), in certain jurisdiction as permitted by applicable law
Cookie IDs
(b)
Location information
, including:
Geo-location or precise location of your device if you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
Location information we infer based on data collected through a WiFi identifier that your device is connected to, in accordance with applicable law and provided location access is permitted
Location information we infer from your device’s IP address, provided that we will not infer location from an IP address to a more precise than city-level of accuracy unless you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
(c)
Network information
, including:
Mobile carrier
Network provider or ISP
Network type (e.g., Wi-Fi or cellular)
IP address
IDs of Wi-Fi access points to which your device is connected
Date and time of connection
(d)
Information about apps or sites and our Software Development Kit (SDK)
, including:
App or site name or version
App identifier
SDK version
API key identifier
(e)
Other information
about/on your device, including:
Device type (e.g., make and model)
Device startup time and update time
Device name
Screen size
Memory and hard drive capacity
Operating system and version (e.g., iOS 14, Android, Windows, Blackberry)
Mobile browser used (e.g., Chrome, Safari, Firefox)
Language settings (including country code) and time zone
App usage
(f)
Advertisement information
. We collect information about the ad presented on your device, including:
The content type of the ad (the advertiser and category, e.g., games, finance, entertainment, news)
The ad type (e.g., whether the ad is a text, image, video, or other format based)
Where the ad is being served (e.g., the site, digital media or app on which the ad appears)
Whether you viewed, clicked, or otherwise interacted with the ad
(g)
Survey information
. We may ask users to voluntarily participate in online surveys. These surveys help brands improve their products and services offered to you. If you fill out a survey, we may collect your device information described above and information you provide, including your:
Age
Name
Email address
Phone number
Gender
Occupation and income range
Family size and other demographic information
Preference for brands, modes of travel, and other consumer choices.
User Information Received from Clients.
In the context of our Services, our Clients, partners, or Service Providers may also disclose to us certain personal or non-personal User Information they have separately collected about you during your interaction with their apps, sites, or services so that we can effectively provide our Services.
We do not use the information they provide to us for any purpose other than as permitted by such third parties or for providing or improving our Services.
3.
How We Use Your Personal Information
We use your personal information for the following purposes:
To provide you with our Sites and Services, which includes:
- maintaining and servicing accounts,
- providing Services to Clients,
- processing and fulfilling orders and transactions,
- verifying Client information,
- processing payments,
- providing financing, and
- providing advertising or marketing services to you.
To provide analytic services, such as analyzing Client usage and improving services offered.
To conduct market research and project planning.
To detect security incidents, protect against fraudulent or other criminal activity, debug and repair errors, and maintain the overall quality and safety of our Sites.
To share your website visitor activity, through website cookies, with third-party marketing partners to market our services on our Sites and other websites that you may visit.
To fulfill our legal and financial obligations.
To provide you with employment opportunities.
Marketing.
We may use your personal information to contact you with newsletters, marketing or promotional materials and other information that may be of interest to you. You may opt out of receiving any, or all, of these communications from us by following the unsubscribe instructions provided in any email we send, or you can contact us using the contact details provided in the “Contact Information” section below. You will still continue to receive service-related messages concerning products and services you have purchased (unless we have indicated otherwise).
User Information on Behalf of Clients.
Our clients use User Information to buy and sell advertising space for display on publishers' websites, mobile applications, and other digital media properties (which we collectively refer to as “Digital Media Properties”). Our clients use information we collect on their behalf, in conjunction with other information they have independently collected, to deliver End users targeted advertising that the Client(s) believe will be of particular interest to those End Users. For more information about how targeted advertising works, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative's (“NAI”) educational page at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/understanding-online-advertising/how-does-it-work
.
We also use User Information on behalf of Clients for other legitimate business interests, including to:
Display advertisements on your device, which may include interest-based advertising customized to your interests, preferences, or locations.
For remarketing or retargeting on behalf of Clients (i.e., to display relevant ads if you have previously visited/accessed/downloaded a site or mobile application that we partner with).
For bidding to serve advertisements and to determine which ads are most effective.
Analyze and provide our demand partners or advertisers with reports on the effectiveness of advertisements and campaigns, including across different types of devices based on our determination of devices that are related to the same person. We, or Service Providers whom we engage to provide this service, may use cross-device data to provide interest-based advertising services and to deliver tailored ads to End Users across multiple mobile devices, including over-the-top applications and smart televisions.
Avoid showing you the same ads too many times.
Build custom audience segments to enable Clients and partners to better target their advertisements and offers to End Users.
Improve our Services and assist Clients and partners in improving their products and services.
Detect, deter, and prevent fraud, fraudulent traffic or to protect the security of our systems.
Process your survey responses and share the response data with the brands who are Clients and/or marketer Service Providers.
4.
How We Share Personal Information
We may share the information we collect or receive about you as described in this Privacy Policy as follows:
Clients.
We share User Information with our advertiser clients to help them identify and buy advertising on publishers' Digital Media Properties. Clients may use this information in conjunction with other information they have independently collected to provide you targeted advertising and to help them evaluate whether a particular ad campaign may be of interest to you.
Business Transfers.
We may share personal information in connection with an actual or proposed sale or transfer of all or a part of our business or assets, corporate merger, consolidation, or bankruptcy.
Vital interest, legal rights, and compliance with laws.
We may share personal information with law enforcement, regulatory authorities, courts with competent jurisdictions, emergency services or other necessary third parties for legal, protection, security, and safety purposes, including:
to comply with laws or regulatory requirements and to respond to lawful requests and legal process;
to protect the rights and property of MobileFuse, our agents, Clients, and others, including enforcing our agreements, policies, and terms of use and protecting our network and physical assets; and/or
to protect the safety of our employees and agents, our Clients, or any person.
Vendors, partners and other Service Providers.
We may share personal information with our vendors, partners, and other Service Providers who perform functions on our or our clients' behalf and require access to such information to provide us with services or do work for us. Examples include: analyzing data, fraud prevention, hosting data, engaging technical support for our technology platform, and performing analysis related to our technology platform and related services.
Aggregated Data.
We may also aggregate or otherwise strip information of all personally identifying characteristics and may share that aggregated, anonymized data with third parties or publish it. We reserve the right to make use of any such aggregated data as we see fit.
5.
Online Advertising & Cookies
We use cookies and beacons to help us collect some of the information we have described above. You can view our Cookie Policy
here
.
6.
Do-Not-Track Signals
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. We do not recognize or respond to browser initiated DNT signals, as the Internet industry is currently still working toward defining exactly what DNT means, what it means to comply with DNT, and a common approach to responding to DNT.
7.
Control Over Your Information
Email Communications.
From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Services, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication. Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Modifying Account Information.
If you have a MobileFuse service account with us, you can modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information). Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of, personal information, you may send your request to us by messaging support through your MobileFuse account. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
8.
Your Opt-Out Choices
MobileFuse does not sell or share the personal information we collect and use as a controller, but our Clients may use our technology to sell or share personal information for targeted or personalized advertising.
There are several ways to opt out of receiving targeted advertising our clients may initiate using our technology. Note that different devices use different identifiers and different technologies, so that you must opt out separately from each browser and each device that you would like to be opted out. If you opt out of targeted advertising, we will no longer collect User Information described above from the opted-out device.
Device-Based.
Your device should give you the ability to opt-out of the use of information about the apps you use in order to serve you ads that are targeted to your interests (see “Opt out of Interest-Based Ads” or “Opt out of Ads Personalization” under your settings menu on Android devices or “Limit Ad Tracking” under your settings menu on iOS devices).
App-Based.
You may stop the collection of location information by particular apps or from your device as a whole at any time by changing the preferences on your mobile device. For more information on how to change your preferences, please see
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
.
Submission-Based.
When we are acting as a data processor for our Clients, our Clients are responsible for satisfying disclosure and consent requirements under applicable data protection laws. However, if you want to opt-out of the sharing of your personal information for interested-based advertising, we can assist you. Please follow the steps below.
Step 1: Locate Your Digital Identifiers
For us to locate relevant records, we will need you to provide us with your digital identifiers. You can find your digital identifiers as follows:
Mobile Devices and other Internet Connected Devices
Certain mobile devices (for example, mobile phones or tablets using the iOS or Android operating systems) generate a persistent “Advertising Identifier” per device, which, among other things, can be used by third parties, like MobileFuse, for purposes of providing you with targeted advertising.
On iOS devices, your Advertising Identifier may be referred to as an “IDFA,” “IFA,” or an “ID for Advertising.” On Android devices, your Advertising Identifier may be referred to as an “Advertising ID.” Please follow instructions from your mobile device manufacturer on how to locate your specific Advertising Identifier.  The following link may also help you
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
.
Step 2: Verify Your Digital Identifiers
To make sure that we are responding to the correct person, we also will need some supporting proof to demonstrate that the devices that have the digital identifiers you located in Step 1 are yours and that the information you are requesting relates to you. For digital identifiers located on a mobile device, please take a screenshot of the screen that displays the digital identifier.
We may also request that you respond to a few questions, so that we can appropriately verify your identity. Doing this helps us to validate that you have access to the device on which the digital identifiers have been placed (and that you are not an unauthorized third party attempting to “guess” digital identifiers).
Step 3: Submit to MobileFuse
Once you have located your digital identifiers and can provide us with verification (screenshots) of those digital identifiers, please contact us with details of the rights you wish to exercise. The easiest way to do so would be to submit the relevant information to our privacy email at
compliance@mobilefuse.com
. We request the following information:
Your full name.
The state and country in which you are located at the time you are making your request.
A clear statement indicating that you would like to opt out of interest-based advertising.
A full list of your digital identifiers with screenshots as set forth in Step 2 above.
9.
Children
Our Services are not directed to, and we do not intend to, or knowingly, collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16. If an individual is under the age of 16, they should not use our Services or otherwise provide us with any personal information either directly or by other means. If a child under the age of 16 has provided personal information to us, we encourage the child’s parent or guardian to contact us to request that we remove the personal information from our systems. If we learn that any personal information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete that personal information.
10.
Information Retention and Security
We typically store the User Information we collect from your device, such as Unique Device ID, IP address and other information described above, in our systems for up to 90 days before we anonymize and aggregate that data into summary reports.
In some cases, we may keep some of the User Information for longer periods of time where required under certain laws or to comply with law enforcement or regulatory requests – for example, those relating to corporate governance, taxation, money laundering and financial reporting legislation.
We use industry-standard technical and organizational security measures to help protect information transmitted over or stored on our systems. Please note that no transmission or storage of information, however, can ever be guaranteed to be completely secure, though we take all reasonable precautions to protect against security incidents.
11.
Third Party Websites and Services
Our website and the ads we service may contain links to other websites. You should be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of such other websites as those may have different privacy policies and terms of use and are not associated with us. You agree that we cannot control these links and we shall not be responsible for any use of such websites.
12.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may change our Privacy Policy at any time. If we make material changes to this privacy policy, we may notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to periodically review this Privacy Policy to ensure you are familiar with the most current version.
13.
Contact Us
For more information about our privacy practices, if you have questions, or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact MobileFuse's Privacy Team by e-mail at
compliance@mobilefuse.com
or by mail using the details provided below:
MobileFuse LLC
Attn: Compliance Team
PO Box 37
Stirling, NJ 07980
USA
14.
Region-Specific Disclosures
This Privacy Policy is designed to apply to our website visitors, users of our Services, and other companies and users on a global basis. Please refer below for additional disclosures that may be applicable to you.
14.1
Additional Disclosures for Certain U.S. Residents
Several jurisdictions grant state residents certain rights and disclosures in relation to their personal information. We provide the following information to further help you understand your potential privacy rights. If you would like to exercise any right or inquire as to whether such rights are available to you, please contact us using the information in the Contact Us section.
Request for Information or Deletion.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to know whether we are processing your personal information, and in some instances, you have the right to request that we disclose to you the categories listed below for the preceding 12 months. We have the right to request verification of your identity for all requests for information. In responding to this right, we shall provide to you:
The categories of personal information we collect about you.
The categories of sources from which your personal information is collected.
The business or commercial purpose(s) for collecting, selling, sharing, or disclosing your personal information, and the categories of personal information disclosed for such purpose(s).
The categories of third parties with whom we share your personal information.
The categories of personal information we have sold, if any, about you and the categories of third parties to whom your personal information was sold, by category or categories of personal information for each third party to whom the personal information was sold.
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
In addition, you may have the right to request we delete your personal information.
Request for Correction.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to request the correction or rectification of inaccurate information in the resident’s personal information.
Request for Portable Data.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to receive, in certain circumstances, a portable format of their personal information that allows the data to be transmitted to another entity.
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal information. MobileFuse does not sell or share the personal information we collect and use as a controller, but our clients may use our technology to sell or share personal information. If you wish to opt out of the use of your personal information for interest-based advertising purposes, you may do so by following the instructions under
Your Opt-Out Choices
section above.
Limiting the Use of Sensitive Personal Information.
Residents of California have the right to direct us to use or disclose sensitive personal information only for providing goods or services, or as otherwise minimally permitted under applicable law. However, we do not collect sensitive personal information for any purpose.
Third Party Marketing.
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 may permit you to request information regarding the disclosure of your personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes. We do not disclose your personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes.
Automated Processing & Profiling.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the processing of personal information for purposes of profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer.
Right to Equal Service & Price.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to receive equal service and price, even if you exercise a privacy right.
Verification Process for Exercising Rights.
To protect our consumers’ privacy, we verify privacy rights requests to ensure that only you (or your authorized agent) can exercise rights pertaining to your personal information. As part of our verification process, we may request you to submit additional information.
If you are an authorized agent wishing to exercise rights on behalf of a state resident, please contact us using the information at the bottom of this Privacy Policy and provide us with a copy of the consumer’s written authorization designating you as their agent. We may need to verify your identity and place of residence before completing your rights request.
Appeal Process.
If we do not decide to act in response to your request to exercise a right, we will provide a timely response detailing the reasons for not taking the action and, depending on your jurisdiction, any rights that you may have to appeal our decision.
14.2
Additional Disclosures for the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
When we use the term “personal information” in this section, we mean information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
Lawful Bases for Processing (EEA and UK Individuals).
If you are from the European Economic Area (EEA) or United Kingdom (UK), our legal bases for collecting and using your personal information is as follows:
The performance of your contract or to enter the contract and to take action on your requests. For example, the processing of your account registration.
Our legitimate business interests. For example, fraud prevention, maintaining the security of our network and services, direct marketing to you, and improvement of our services.
Compliance with a mandatory legal obligation. For example, accounting and tax requirements, which are subject to mandatory retention periods. We may also collect your personal information to record your requests to exercise your rights and to verify your identity for such requests.
Consent you provide where we do not rely on another legal basis. Consent may be withdrawn at any time.
In some limited cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet law enforcement requirements.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this Privacy Policy.
EEA or UK Individuals’ Rights
. If you are from the EEA or UK, you have the right, under certain circumstances, to:
Access your personal information;
Correct inaccurate information in your personal information;
Request erasure of your personal information without undue delay;
Request restriction of, in certain circumstances, the processing of your personal information;
Request receiving a portable copy of your personal information held by us, and to have that portable copy transmitted to another controller; and
To object to the processing of your personal information.
To exercise any of these rights, contact us using the contact details provided in the Contact Us section of this Privacy Policy, and please specify which privacy right(s) you wish to exercise. We may need to verify your identity to honor your request.
International Transfers of Data.
The personal information we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside the EEA, UK and Switzerland in countries where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States.
In the event of such a transfer by us, we ensure that: (i) the personal information is transferred to countries recognized as offering an equivalent level of protection; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission.
If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out under the “Contact Us” section of the Privacy Policy.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
If you have any issues with our compliance, you have the right to lodge a complaint with an EEA supervisory authority. We would, however, appreciate the opportunity to first address your concerns and would welcome you directing an inquiry to us via the contact information at the bottom of this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Protection Officer.
As part of our commitment to protecting your personal information, we have appointed a data protection officer (DPO) monitor compliance and provide advice. Our DPO’s contact information is
dpo@mobilefuse.com
.
PO BOX 37
STIRLING, NJ 07980
MOBILEFUSE, LLC | © 2025
ALL RIGHTS RESERVED
PRIVACY & OPT-OUT
ADVERTISERS
PUBLISHERS
PROGRAMMATIC BUYERS
CREATIVE SHOWCASE
SUSTAINABILITY
NEWS
CAREERS
CONTACT
DEVELOPER
ABOUT US
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
We use cookies to provide you with a great experience and to help our website run effectively. We also share information about your use of our site with our analytics partners in the United States. Select the types of cookies we can use.
Cookies policy
All
Essential
Sub-policy 3
https://www.moloco.com/privacy-policy:
New insights!
Unlock global growth with Beyond Borders: Mobile Gaming Insights for Global Growth.
ACCESS FREE REPORT
Products
products
Grow your users through performance advertising
Moloco Ads (Moloco Cloud DSP)
Monetize your commerce platform
Moloco Commerce Media (Retail Media Platform)
Launch a full-funnel advertising business
Moloco Streaming Monetization
Solutions
SOLUTIONS
For Mobile App Marketers
For Agency Partners
For Commerce Platforms
For Streaming Platforms
Resources
resources
Blog
Reports
Case Studies
Events
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Moloco Ads Help Center
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Company
company
About Moloco
Careers
Newsroom
Solutions
Solutions
Moloco Ads (Moloco Cloud DSP)
Grow your app on the open internet
Moloco Commerce Media (Retail Media Platform)
Turn online retail and marketplaces into a thriving ads business
Moloco Streaming Monetization
Future-proof your streaming ad platform
Resources
resources
Blog
Reports
Case Studies
Events
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Moloco Ads Help Center
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Company
company
About Moloco
Careers
Newsroom
Solutions
Solutions
For Marketers
Moloco Ads - Grow your app on the open internet
For Publishers
Moloco SDK - Maximize your app's revenue
For Retailers/Marketplaces
Moloco Commerce Media - Build your own performance ads business
For Streaming Platforms
Moloco Streaming Monetization - Future-proof your streaming ads platform
Solutions
Solutions
For Marketers
For Publishers
For Retailers/Marketplaces
For Streaming Platforms
Moloco Ads
Grow your app on the open internet
Moloco Ads for Agencies
Case studies, blogs, reports
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Moloco Ads Help Center
Moloco SDK
Maximize your app's revenue
Case studies, blogs, reports
Moloco SDK Help Center
Moloco Commerce Media
Build your own performance ads business
Case studies, blogs, reports
Commerce Media GrowthU
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Moloco Streaming
Future-proof your streaming ads platform
Case studies, blogs, reports
Resources
resources
Blog
Reports
Case Studies
Events
Moloco Help Center
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Commerce Media GrowthU
Company
company
About Moloco
Careers
Newsroom
English
한국어
简体中文
日本語
Français
Deutsch
Contact us
Join us as Moloco takes the stage for Advertising Week NYC 2024, Oct 7-10
English
한국어
简体中文
日本語
Français
Deutsch
Products
Grow your users through performance advertising
Moloco Ads (Moloco Cloud DSP)
Monetize your commerce platform
Moloco Commerce Media (Retail Media Platform)
Launch a full-funnel advertising business
Moloco Streaming Monetization
Solutions
For Mobile App Marketers
For Agency Partners
For Commerce Platforms
For Streaming Platforms
Solutions
Moloco Ads
Grow your app on the open internet
Moloco Commerce Media
Turn online retail and marketplaces into a thriving ads business
Moloco Streaming Monetization
Future-proof your streaming ad platform
Solutions
For Marketers
Moloco Ads - Grow your app on the open internet
For Publishers
Moloco SDK - Maximize your app's revenue
For Retailer/Marketplaces
Moloco Commerce Media - Build your own performance ads business
For Streaming Platforms
Moloco Streaming Monetization - Future-proof your streaming ads platform
Solutions
Back
Moloco Ads
Grow your app on the open internet
Moloco Ads for Agencies
Case studies, blogs, reports
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Moloco Ads Help Center
Back
Moloco SDK
Maximize your app's revenue
Case studies, blogs, reports
Moloco SDK Help Center
Back
Moloco Commerce Media
Build your own performance ads business
Case studies, blogs, reports
Commerce Media GrowthU+
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Back
Moloco Streaming Monetization
Future-proof your streaming ads platform
Case studies, blogs, reports
For Marketers
For Publishers
For Retailer/Marketplaces
For Streaming Platforms
Resources
Blog
Reports
Case Studies
Events
Moloco Help Center
Moloco Ads Developer Hub
Commerce Media Developer Hub
Commerce Media GrowthU
Company
About Moloco
Careers
Newsroom
Contact us
Effective Date: February 27, 2025
Moloco's privacy policy
Moloco Inc Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice applies to personal information processed by Moloco Inc. (“Moloco,” “we,” “us,” and “our”) through our website
https://www.moloco.com/
and related Moloco offerings. To make this Privacy Notice easier to read, our website and related offerings are collectively called the “Services.”
An Important Note: Except as otherwise stated, this Privacy Notice does not apply to any of the personal information that Moloco’s products or services process, including Moloco’s demand-side platform offering. For details about the personal information Moloco processes via its demand-side platform, please visit the Moloco
Demand-Side Platform Privacy Notice
.
Personal information we collect
The categories of personal information we collect depend on how you interact with our Services.
‍
Information you provide to us:
‍
‍
Account information.
If you create an account with Moloco, we will collect personal information such as your name and email address in order to provision your account.
‍
‍
Your communications with us
. We collect personal information from you such as your email address, phone number, or mailing address when you request information about or a demo of our products and services, sign up for marketing from us, register for our newsletter, request customer or technical support, or otherwise communicate with us.
‍
Surveys
. We may contact you to participate in surveys. If you decide to participate, you may be asked to provide certain information which may include personal information.
Interactive features
. We may offer interactive features such as blogs and social media pages. We and others who use our Services may collect the information you submit or make available through these interactive features. Any content you provide on the public sections of these features will be considered “public” and is not subject to the privacy protections referenced herein. By using these interactive features, you assume the risk that the personal information provided by you may be viewed and used by third parties for their own purposes.
Conferences, trade shows, and other events.
We may attend conferences, trade shows, and other events where we collect personal information from individuals who interact with or express an interest in Moloco. If you provide us with any information at one of these events, we will use it for the purposes for which it was collected.
Business development and strategic partnerships.
We may collect personal information from individuals and third parties to assess and pursue potential business opportunities.
‍
Job applications.
We may post job openings and opportunities on the Services. If you reply to one of these postings by submitting your application, CV and/or cover letter to us, we will collect and process the information contained therein to assess your suitability, aptitude, skills, and qualifications for employment with Moloco.
‍
Information collected automatically
Automatic data collection. We may collect certain information automatically when you use the Services. This information may include your Internet protocol (IP) address, user settings, MAC address, cookie identifiers, mobile advertising and other unique identifiers, details about your browser, operating system or device, location information (including inferred location based off of your IP address), Internet service provider, mobile carrier, pages that you visit before, during and after using the Services, information about the links you click, information about how you interact with the Services, including the frequency and duration of your activities, and other information about how you use the Services.
Cookies, pixel tags/web beacons, and analytics information.
We, as well as third parties that provide content, advertising, or other functionality on the Services, may use cookies, pixel tags, local storage, and other technologies (“Technologies”) to automatically collect information through the Services. Technologies are essentially small data files placed on your device that allow us and our partners to record certain pieces of information whenever you visit or interact with our Services.
Cookies
. Cookies are small text files placed in device browsers to store their preferences. Most browsers allow you to block and delete cookies. However, if you do that, the Services may not work properly.
Pixel Tags/Web Beacons
. A pixel tag (also known as a web beacon) is a piece of code embedded in the Services that collects information about engagement on the Services. The use of a pixel tag allows us to record, for example, that a user has visited a particular web page or clicked on a particular advertisement. We may also include web beacons in e-mails to understand whether messages have been opened, acted on, or forwarded.
Analytics
. We may process analytics information on our Services, including through the use of Technologies.
For more information about our use of cookies and other Technologies, please visit our
Cookie Policy
.
‍
Information from Other Sources
We may obtain information about you from other sources, including from third party services and organizations.
How we use your information
We use your personal information for a variety of business purposes, including:
To Provide the Services or Information Requested, such as:
Fulfilling our contract with you;
Responding to questions, comments, and other requests;
Allowing you to register for events;
Providing access to certain areas, functionalities, and features of our Services; and
Answering requests for customer or technical support.
Administrative Purposes, such as:
Pursuing legitimate interests, such as direct marketing, research and development (including marketing research), network and information security, and fraud prevention;
Measuring interest and engagement in our Services;
Improving the Services;
Developing new products and services;
Ensuring internal quality control and safety;
Authenticating and verifying individual identities;
Carrying out audits;
Communicating with you about your account, activities on our Services and Privacy Notice changes;
Preventing and prosecuting potentially prohibited or illegal activities;
Enforcing our agreements; and
Complying with our legal obligations.
Marketing our products and services.
We may use personal information to tailor and provide you with content and advertisements. We may provide you with these materials as permitted by applicable law.
If you have any questions about our marketing practices or if you would like to opt out of the use of your personal information for marketing purposes, you may contact us at any time as set forth below.
Consent
. We may use personal information for other purposes that are clearly disclosed to you at the time you provide personal information or with your consent.
How we use cookies and other technologies
. For more information about how we use cookies and other Technologies, please visit our
Cookie Policy
.
Use of de-identified and aggregated information
. We may use personal information and other data about you to create de-identified and/or aggregated information, such as de-identified demographic information, de-identified location information, information about the device from which you access our Services, or other analyses we create. De-identified and/or aggregated information is not personal information, and we may use and disclose such information in a number of ways, including research, internal analysis, analytics, and any other legally permissible purposes.
Share content with friends or colleagues
. Our Services may offer various tools and functionalities. For example, we may allow you to provide information about your friends through our referral services. Our referral services may allow you to forward or share certain content with a friend or colleague, such as an email inviting your friend to use our Services.
Disclosing your information to third parties
We may share your personal information with the following categories of third parties:
Moloco customers.
If you access our Services as an authorized user of one of Moloco’s customers, the Moloco customer may access information associated with your use of the Services including usage data and the contents of the communications and files associated with your account. Your personal information may also be subject to the Moloco customer’s privacy policy. We are not responsible for the Moloco customer’s processing of your personal information.
Service providers.
We may share any personal information we collect about you with our third-party service providers. The categories of service providers to whom we entrust personal information include service providers for: (i) the provision of the Services; (ii) the provision of information, products, and other services you have requested; (iii) marketing and advertising; (iv) payment and transaction processing; (v) customer service activities; and (vi) the provision of IT and related services.
Business partners.
We may provide personal information to business partners to provide you with a product or service you have requested. We may also provide personal information to business partners with whom we jointly offer products or services.
Affiliates.
We may share personal information with Moloco’s affiliated entities.
Advertising partners.
Through our Services, we may allow third party advertising partners to set Technologies and other tracking tools to collect information regarding your activities and your device (e.g., your IP address, cookie identifiers, page(s) visited, location, time of day). These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements to you when you visit third party services within their networks. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “personalized advertising.” If you prefer not to share your personal information with third-party advertising partners, you may follow the instructions in our
Cookie Policy
.
Disclosures to protect us or others.
We may access, preserve, and disclose any information we store in association with you to external parties if we, in good faith, believe doing so is required or appropriate to: (i) comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; (ii) protect your, our, or others’ rights, property, or safety; (iii) enforce our policies or contracts; (iv) collect amounts owed to us; or (v) assist with an investigation and prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity.
Disclosure in the event of merger, sale, or other asset transfer.
If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract.
International data transfers
All information processed by us may be transferred, processed, and stored anywhere in the world, including but not limited to, the United States or other countries, which may have data protection laws that are different from the laws where you live. We endeavor to safeguard your information consistent with the requirements of applicable laws.
Your choices
General.
You may be able to opt out of certain uses of your personal information.
Email communications.
If you receive an unwanted email from us, you can use the unsubscribe link found at the bottom of the email to opt out of receiving future emails. Note that you will continue to receive transaction-related emails regarding products or Services you have requested. We may also send you certain non-promotional communications regarding us and our Services, and you will not be able to opt out of those communications (e.g., communications regarding the Services or updates to our Terms of Service or this Privacy Notice).
“Do Not Track”.
Do Not Track (“
DNT
”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers.
Your privacy rights
In accordance with applicable law, you may have the right to: (i) request confirmation of whether we are processing your personal information; (ii) obtain access to or a copy of your personal information; (iii) receive an electronic copy of personal information that you have provided to us, or ask us to send that information to another company (the “right of data portability”); (iv) object to or restrict our uses of your personal information; (v) seek correction or amendment of inaccurate, untrue, incomplete, or improperly processed personal information; (vi) withdraw your consent; and (vii) request erasure of personal information held about you by us, subject to certain exceptions prescribed by law. If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please contact us as set forth below.
We will process such requests in accordance with applicable laws. To protect your privacy, we will take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request.
Data retention
We store the personal information we receive as described in this Privacy Notice for as long as you use our Services or as necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was collected, provide our Services, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, pursue legitimate business purposes, enforce our agreements, and comply with applicable laws.
SUPPLEMENTAL CALIFORNIA PRIVACY NOTICE
This Supplemental California Privacy Notice only applies to our processing of personal information that is subject to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”). The CCPA provides California residents with the right to know what categories of personal information Moloco has collected about them and whether Moloco disclosed that personal information for a business purpose (e.g., to a service provider) in the preceding 12 months. California residents can find this information below:
Category of personal information collected by Moloco
Identifiers
Personal information categories listed in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)
Commercial information
Internet or other electronic network activity
Professional or employment-related information
Inferences drawn from other personal information to create a profile about a consumer
Categories of third parties personal information is disclosed to for a business purpose
Service providers
Advertising networks
The categories of sources from which we collect personal information and our business and commercial purposes for using personal information are set forth above.
“Sales” of personal information under the CCPA
For purposes of the CCPA, Moloco does not “sell” personal information, nor do we have actual knowledge of any “sale” of personal information of minors under 16 years of age.
Additional privacy rights for California residents
Non-Discrimination.
California residents have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of their rights conferred by the CCPA.
Authorized agent.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. To designate an authorized agent, please contact us as set forth below.
Verification
. When you make a request, we will ask you to provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, which may include confirming the email address associated with any personal information we have about you.
If you are a California resident and would like to exercise any of your rights under the CCPA, please contact us as set forth below. We will process such requests in accordance with applicable laws.
Security of your information
We take steps to ensure that your information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Notice. Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, we do not accept liability for unauthorized disclosure.
By using the Services or providing personal information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of the Services. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on the Services, by mail or by sending an email to you.
Third party websites/applications
The Services may contain links to other websites/applications and other websites/applications may reference or link to our Services. These third-party services are not controlled by us. We encourage our users to read the privacy policies of each website and application with which they interact. We do not endorse, screen or approve, and are not responsible for, the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Providing personal information to third party websites or applications is at your own risk.
Children's information
The Services are not directed to children under 13 (or other age as required by local law), and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children. If you learn that your child has provided us with personal information without your consent, you may contact us as set forth below. If we learn that we have collected a child’s personal information in violation of applicable law, we will promptly take steps to delete such information and terminate the child’s account.
SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
If you are located in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you believe our processing of your personal information violates applicable law.
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY NOTICE
We may revise this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. If there are any material changes to this Privacy Notice, we will notify you as required by applicable law. You understand and agree that you will be deemed to have accepted the updated Privacy Notice if you continue to use the Services after the new Privacy Notice takes effect.
CONTACT US
If you have any questions about our privacy practices or this Privacy Notice, or if you wish to submit a request to exercise your rights as detailed in this Privacy Notice, please contact us at:
Attn: Privacy Group
Moloco Inc.
601 Marshall St, 5th Floor
Redwood City, CA 94063
privacy@moloco.com
UK GDPR Representative: Moloco UK Limited, with registered address No.1 London Bridge, London, SE1 9BG
‍
EU GDPR Representative: Moloco Germany GmbH, with registered address Am Zirkus 2, 10117 Berlin
‍
‍
‍
‍
Sub-policy 4
https://linecorp.com/en/privacy/your_personal_information/:
Privacy Principles
Your Personal Data
What type of personal data do we collect?
How do we use personal data?
Do we share personal data?
How do we secure personal data?
Your Choices, Your Rights
Additional Notes
Third-party modules and cookies
Advertising
LINE Privacy Policy
Your Personal Data
What type of personal data do we collect?
Personal data means information relating to an individual.
We collect personal data through the course of providing you with our services. Personal data includes the information you provide, information we collect as you use our services, information we receive from our group companies and business partners, information uploaded by other users, information collected directly from services provided by third parties and information collected from the public domain.
Information you provide
We collect information that you provide or create when you use our services.
For example, when you sign up for a LINE account, you provide us with information such as your phone number. Also, when you create your public profile, you provide us with a display name, profile picture, and other information you wish to use.
Information we collect as you use our services
We also collect information that is automatically sent by your device when you use our services.
This includes information regarding the devices—whether smartphone or PC—and operating systems you use to access our services, the language you use on your device, and information related to how often you open the LINE App.
Information we receive from group companies & business partners
LINE also works with our group companies and business partners to provide services for you.
For example, if you sign up for the LINE Pay service, which is provided by another LINE group company called LINE Pay Corporation (depending on your location), LINE may receive information based on the privacy policy of that group company.
Also, if you link another company's services to your LINE account, we may receive associated information from the company that provides the service, such as the user ID linked with the account.
Information uploaded by other users
Other users, while using LINE services, may provide us with information which includes the personal data of third parties.
For example, your friend may post a photo which includes you on their LINE VOOM.
Information collected directly from services provided by third parties
We provide functions that can be used on third-party websites and apps (plug-in functions) such as the "LINE Share" button and "Like" button. If such a plug-in function is installed on a third-party website or app, LINE may collect information directly from the website or app of that third party.
Information collected from websites and apps that have plug-in functions may include information about the websites you logged into using your LINE account and the websites you visited while logged in to your LINE account.
Information collected from public domain
LINE collects publicly available information.
The public information collected by LINE includes online news published on the Internet.
How do we use personal data?
LINE collects and uses personal data in accordance with the LINE Privacy Policy to provide and maintain services and contents. We also use that personal data to develop and improve on, strengthen security and prevent the unauthorized use of, and provide you with personalized services and content.
Provide and maintain services
We use your personal data to help provide a stable and smooth experience using LINE services.
For example, if your friends have your phone number, your friends can search for your LINE account using the phone number you provided during your LINE account registration. Your friends can then recognize that it is your LINE account via your public profile. This means that with the personal data collected we are providing a way for you to connect with your friends at any time.
Develop and improve services and content
The personal data we collect allows us to develop new services and improve on existing services to better serve you.
For example, we collect information about what LINE App features you use frequently to ensure that you can use those features conveniently.
Strengthen security and prevent unauthorized use
To provide you with a safe environment for staying in touch with your friends, family and loved ones on LINE services, we analyze information to help protect you, other users, the public and LINE.
For example, when we find users who engage in spamming activities, like sending messages indiscriminately to a lot of users—which is against the LINE Terms & Conditions of Use—we may take action against them, which may include banning their accounts.
Personalize content
We also use the personal data we collect to help you find what you like and to provide you with better search results.
For example, we may arrange the order of the stickers at the LINE Store based on your prior sticker purchasing history, so when you visit the LINE Store, it’ll be easier for you to discover new stickers that you may like.
Do we share personal data?
In certain limited circumstances, LINE shares personal data with LINE group companies and business partners to support the provision of services.
We never share your personal data unless we have obtained your consent or beyond what is permitted by laws and regulations. We work with LINE group companies and business partners to better provide you with LINE services and partnering services. For example, if you choose to sign up for a LINE Pay account, we share the information you registered with your LINE account—such as your phone number—to LINE Pay to speed up the opening of the LINE Pay account.
In addition, to facilitate the delivery of LINE services like customer support, we are assisted by certain LINE group companies and business partners, who use your personal data in accordance with our instructions.
We do not sell your personal data to third parties.
How do we secure personal data?
LINE implements strict technical and organizational security for the protection of your personal data.
Since your personal data will be held by us while your LINE account is active, we will always make our best efforts to ensure that your personal data is securely maintained.
If you want further details on how your personal data is being protected, please see the Security & Privacy page here:
Security & Privacy
Sub-policy 5
https://www.fyber.com.au/privacy-policy:
No results found.
Privacy Policy
Effective Date: 3-10-2019
In this Privacy Policy, ‘us‘ ‘we‘ or ‘our‘ means Fyber Flooring Pty Ltd t/as Fyber (ABN 22 618 633 784).
We are committed to respecting your privacy. Our Privacy Policy sets outs out how we collect, use, store and disclose your personal information in accordance with the Australian Privacy Principles contained in the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (Privacy Act).
By providing personal information to us, you consent to our collection, use and disclosure of your personal information in accordance with this Privacy Policy and any other arrangements that apply between us. We may change our Privacy Policy from time to time by publishing changes to it on our website. We encourage you to check our website periodically to ensure that you are aware of our current Privacy Policy.
Personal information includes information or an opinion about an individual that is reasonably identifiable. For example, this may include your name and contact details.
Why do we collect, use and disclose personal information?
We may collect the following types of personal information:
your name, personal or work mailing or street address, email address, telephone number and other contact details,
your device ID, device type, geo-location information, computer and connection information, statistics on page views, traffic to and from the sites, ad data, IP address and standard web log information;
details of the products and services we have provided to you or that you have enquired about, including any additional information necessary to deliver those products and services and respond to your enquiries;
any additional information relating to you that you provide to us directly or indirectly through our website;
personal information you provide to us through client surveys; or
any other personal information that may be required in order to facilitate your dealings with us.
We may collect these types of personal information either directly from you, or from third parties.
We may collect this information when you:
use or interact with our website;
purchase a product;
communicate with us through correspondence, social networking sites (eg Facebook, Twitter, Instagram), chats, email, or when you share information with us from other social applications, services or websites;
provide your personal information to a third party, who then provides it to us with your consent;
respond to our advertising campaigns; and/or
invest in our business or enquire as to a potential investment in or purchase of our business.
What personal information do we collect?
We may collect, hold, use and disclose your personal information for the following purposes:
to enable you to access and use our services;
to operate, protect, improve and optimise our website, services and user-experience such as to perform conduct research and for advertising and marketing;
to send you service, support and administrative messages, reminders, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and information requested by you;
to send you marketing and promotional messages and other information that may be of interest to you;
to administer rewards, surveys, contests, or other promotional activities or events sponsored or managed by us or our business partners;
to provide information credit reporting agencies and courts, tribunals and regulatory authorities if a client fails to pay for services provided;
to courts, tribunals, regulatory authorities, and law enforcement officers as required by law, in connection with any actual or prospective legal proceedings, or in order to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; and
to comply with our legal obligations, resolve any disputes that we may have with any of our website users or clients, and enforce our agreements with third parties.
We may also disclose your personal information to a trusted third-party service provider who holds other information about you. This third party may combine that information in order to enable it and us to develop anonymised consumer insights so that we can better understand your preferences and interests, personalise your experience and enhance the products and services that you receive.
Do we use your personal information for direct marketing?
We may send you direct marketing communications and information about our services. These communications may take the form of emails, SMS, mail or other forms of communication. You may opt-out of receiving direct marketing communications from us by contacting us using the details set out below or by using the opt-out facilities provided (eg an unsubscribe link).
To whom do we disclose your personal information?
We may disclose personal information for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy to:
third party service providers – including cloud-based storage solution service providers, marketing agencies and other service providers – that we rely on to operate our website, support our business operations, and otherwise provide services;
professional advisers;
our existing or potential agents, business partners or partners;
our sponsors or promoters of any competition that we conduct via our services;
anyone to whom our assets or businesses (or any part of them) are transferred;
specific third parties authorised by you to receive information held by us; and/or
other persons, including government agencies, regulatory bodies and law enforcement agencies, or as required, authorised or permitted by law.
Disclosure of personal information outside Australia
We may disclose personal information outside of Australia to our third party supplier of cloud-based storage solution (Microsoft OneDrive), whose registered business address is located in the United States of America.
When you provide your personal information to us, you consent to the disclosure of your information outside of Australia and acknowledge that we are not required to ensure that overseas recipients handle that personal information in compliance with the Privacy Act. We will, however, take reasonable steps to ensure that any overseas recipient will deal with such personal information in a way that is consistent with the Privacy Act (including the Australian Privacy Principles).
Using our website and cookies
We may collect personal information about you when you use and access our website. While we do not use browsing information to identify you personally, we may record certain information about your use of our website, such as which pages you visit, the time and date of your visit and the internet protocol address assigned to your computer.
We may also use ‘cookies’ or other similar tracking technologies on our website that help us track your website usage and remember your preferences. Cookies are small files that store information on your computer, mobile phone or other device. They enable the entity that put the cookie on your device to recognise you across different websites, services, devices and/or browsing sessions. You can disable cookies, but our website may not work as intended for you if you do so.
We use cookies to collect personal information to enable us to understand your interests, which pages and advertisements you have seen (including any renavigations from links in emails), and how frequently particular pages have been visited. We may use cookies to enrich your experience of using the website by allowing us to tailor what advertisements you see and what information you receive, where you have agreed do so, to what we have learned about your preferences. Sometimes we may use services of third parties, and they may use cookies or the information collected from cookies on our behalf to provide their services.
We will handle any personal information collected by cookies in the same way that we handle all other personal information as described in this Privacy Policy.
Security
We may hold your personal information in either electronic or hard copy form. We take reasonable steps to protect your personal information from misuse, interference and loss, as well as unauthorised access, modification or disclosure and we use a number of physical, administrative, personnel and technical measures to protect your personal information. In particular:
access to information systems is controlled through identity and access management, including password protection and data encryption;
we require website users to not take any action that would constitute a breach of the privacy rights of an individual in our Website Terms and Conditions; and
we require contractors that might have access to your personal information to enter into a binding legal contract requiring them to keep that information confidential.
However, we cannot guarantee the security of your personal information.
Links
Our website, and documents produced in the course of providing the services such as reports, may contain links to websites operated by third parties. Those links are provided for convenience and may not remain current or be maintained. Unless expressly stated otherwise, we are not responsible for the privacy practices of, or any content on, those linked websites, and have no control over or rights in those linked websites. The privacy policies and other terms that apply to those other websites may differ substantially from our Privacy Policy, so we encourage individuals to read them before using those websites.
Accessing or correcting your personal information
You can access the personal information we hold about you by contacting us using the below contact information. Sometimes, we may not be able to provide you with access to all of your personal information and, where this is the case, we will tell you why. We may also need to verify your identity when you request your personal information.
If you think that any personal information we hold about you is inaccurate, out of date, incomplete, irrelevant or misleading, please contact us using the below contact information and we will take reasonable steps to ensure that it is corrected.
Making a complaint
If you think we have breached the Privacy Act, or you wish to make a complaint about the way we have handled your personal information, you can contact us about your complaint using the below contact information. Please include your name, email address and/or telephone number and clearly describe your complaint. We will acknowledge your complaint and respond to you regarding your complaint within a reasonable period of time. If you think that we have failed to resolve the complaint satisfactorily, please let us know and we will provide you with information about the further steps you can take.
Contact Us
For further information about our Privacy Policy or practices, or to access or correct your personal information, or make a complaint, please contact us using the following contact details:
By Mail: Privacy Officer
Fyber Flooring Pty Ltd
Level 1, 68 Sophia Street,
Surry Hills
NSW, Australia 2010
By Email: info@fyber.com.au
­
­
×
New Enquiry
Project Type
(required)
Select an option
Residential
Commercial
Name
(required)
First Name
Last Name
Business Name
Email
(required)
Enquiry
(required)
Submit
Submit
Sub-policy 6
https://www.is.com/privacy-policy/:
Please note: This website includes an accessibility system. Press Control-F11 to adjust the website to the visually impaired who are using a screen reader; Press Control-F10 to open an accessibility menu.
Accessibility
Popup heading
Close
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Accessibility for blind people
who use screen readers
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Keyboard Navigation
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Accessibility menu



Platform
Monetization
Marketing
Analytics
Publishing
Products
Unity LevelPlay
Mediation
ironSource Network
Ad network
Tapjoy
Offerwall
Aura
On-device solutions
Supersonic
Publishing
Luna
Cross-channel management
Learn
Community
Blog
Case studies
LevelUp Academy
Knowledge center
Glossary
Company
About
Careers
Newsroom
Contact us
Log into Tapjoy
Login
Login
Signup
Signup
ironSource Website Privacy Policy
Last Updated: August 6th, 2024
The following policy governs how ironSource Ltd. (“ironSource“, “Company” “we” or “us“), and its subsidiaries, handle information collected from users of its websites, at the addresses
is.com/
, lunalabs.io/, bidalgo.com/, tapjoy.com/ and their subdomains (the “Sites“), including ironSource Mobile Dashboard, Tapjoy Dashboard, Luna Create Hub and the Luna Control Hub (the “Dashboards”).
Capitalized terms which are not defined herein, shall have the meaning ascribed to them in our Terms of Use available on the Site, which this Privacy Policy is incorporated thereto by reference.
Please note that this privacy policy covers our privacy practices only with respect to the Sites.
If you would like to review our privacy policies for our products and services, please see the links below:
Mobile Ad Network and Mediation Platform –
https://developers.ironsrc.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/
Supersonic Studios Apps –
https://supersonic.com/privacy/
Tapjoy’s privacy policy –
https://dev.tapjoy.com/en/legal/Privacy-Policy
The Sites are accessible for individuals around the world. Accordingly, throughout the document, we try to harmonize our approach and the language of the privacy policy as much as possible. However, sometimes we refer to specific laws that require further disclosures. These disclosures cover laws and regulations applicable to the following regions:
Individuals who we deem to be located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom, or Switzerland
– With respect to the collection and processing of their personal data, as defined by the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), and the UK Data Protection Act.
If you are a resident of California, Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Utah, Florida, Oregon, Texas, Montana, Delaware, Iowa, Nebraska, New Hampshire and New Jersey
– please see “State Privacy Rights” section of this privacy policy for information related to privacy laws in these states.
Your Consent (PLEASE READ CAREFULLY!)
BY ACCESSING THE SITES AND/OR USING THE SITES, YOU AGREE TO THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS SET FORTH IN THIS PRIVACY POLICY (THE “PRIVACY POLICY“), INCLUDING TO THE COLLECTION AND PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION (AS DEFINED BELOW). IF YOU DISAGREE TO ANY TERM PROVIDED HEREIN, YOU MAY NOT USE THE SITES.
Information We Collect, and Purposes of Processing
We collect the following types of information from Users:
Information collected automatically from Users who are visiting the Sites (“Site Information”):
Technical Information
– Technical information about your browser and device is automatically collected when you visit the Sites, or the Dashboard apps. Such information consists of the device’s IP address, device ID, the type and version of browser used to access the Sites, operating system, language of the browser and operating system, and type of device.
Interaction Information
– Information about your interactions with the Sites or Dashboard apps (e.g. whether you clicked on a specific link, where you clicked, time on Sites, etc.).
Information you voluntarily provide us:
Registration Information
– When you register to our services, you will be asked to provide your email address, password, billing information, details about your apps, and payment details.
Job Application Information
– When you choose to apply for a job at ironSource via the Sites, you will be requested to provide us with your full name, email address, phone number, link to your Linkedin page, link to your website, and your CV.
Newsletter Information
– If you subscribe to our newsletter, you will be requested to provide your email address.
Event Information
– If you choose to register to an event we host, you will be requested to provide us with your full name, email address, phone number, job title, current company, and such other information necessary for attending the event.
Communication Information
– If you choose to communicate with us via an online form on the Sites, email, or automated chat service (‘chat bot’), you may provide us with information such as your name, and your email address, and any other information you choose to share with us.
Luna Create Hub Service Information
– If you use Luna Create Hub, you may permit us to upload your video creatives to your YouTube channel on your behalf, using YouTube API Services, by logging in to your YouTube account and providing us with your account’s session token. By using Luna Create Hub in that manner, you agree to be bound by the YouTube terms of service, available
here
. You may revoke our access to that information at any time via the Google security settings page
here
. You can find more information about Google’s privacy practices in the Google Privacy Policy, available
here
.
What are the Purposes of the Collection of Information?
We use the information we collect for the following purposes:
Sharing Information with Third Parties
We may share information with our subsidiaries and affiliated companies, and with vendors and service providers for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Policy. We may also disclose information if we have a good faith belief that disclosure of such information is reasonably necessary to: (i) comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request; (ii) enforce our agreements and policies, including investigations of potential violations thereof; (iii) investigate, detect, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities or other wrongdoing, suspected fraud or security issues; (iv) to establish or exercise our rights to defend against legal claims; (v) prevent harm to the rights, property or safety of us, our users, yourself or any third party; (vi) for the purpose of collaborating with law enforcement agencies or in case we find it necessary in order to enforce intellectual property or other legal rights; or (vii) when we are undergoing any change in control, including by means of merger, acquisition or purchase of all or substantially all of our assets.
Deletion or Modification of Personal Information
If for any reason you wish to modify or delete your Personal Information please send us an email to website-privacy-request@ironsrc.com, and we will make reasonable efforts to modify or delete any such Personal Information pursuant to any applicable privacy laws.
Retention of Information
We store information for as long as is reasonably necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as explained in this privacy policy. In some circumstances we may store information for longer periods of time, for instance where we are required to do so in accordance with legal, regulatory, tax, accounting requirements.
Minors
To use the Sites, you must be over the age of eighteen (18). Therefore, ironSource does not knowingly collect personal information from individuals under the age of eighteen (18) and does not wish to do so.  If you have any reason to believe that a minor has shared Personal Information with us, please contact us.
Third Party Sites
While using the Sites you may encounter links to third party websites. Please be advised that such third party websites are independent sites, and we assume no responsibility or liability whatsoever with regard to privacy matters or any other legal matter with respect to such sites. We encourage you to carefully read the privacy policies and the terms of use or service of such websites.
Cookies
When you access or use the Sites, we may use industry-wide technologies such as “cookies” (or similar technologies), which store certain information on your computer and which will allow us to enable automatic activation of certain features, and make your service experience much more convenient and effortless. It is easy to prohibit certain cookies. You can do so by editing your preferences through the Site’s cookie settings link. In addition, most browsers will allow you to erase cookies from your computer’s hard drive, block acceptance of cookies, or receive a warning before a cookie is stored. However, if you block or erase cookies your online experience may be limited.
Information to Individuals Located in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom
International Transfers
– We store personal data on our Amazon Web Services servers in the United States, and on the servers of our processors, which may be located outside of the European Union, or the United Kingdom. We will transfer personal data countries which are recognized as providing an adequate level of legal protection or where we can be satisfied that alternative arrangement are in place to protect your privacy rights.
Your Rights
– Data subjects have the right to request us to access, rectify or erase personal data that we process, or to restrict or object to its processing in accordance with the provisions of the GDPR. A data subject can submit a request for exercising these rights by sending us an email to website-privacy-request@ironsrc.com. Please note that we will process the request subject to verification of the consumer’s identity.
A data subject that chooses to withdraw consent can do that by the cookie settings available on the Site.
A data subject also has the right to file a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority (e.g. of the consumer’s country or domicile) where we have not addressed the data subject’s concerns.
State Privacy Rights
California, Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Utah, Florida, Oregon, Texas, Montana, Delaware, Iowa, Nebraska, New Hampshire and New Jersey residents have certain rights under state privacy laws with respect to personal data we collect.  If you are a resident of such states, this section of the privacy policy contains disclosures required by law and explains rights that may be available to you.
In the past 12 months, we have collected, sold (including sharing for targeted advertising), and disclosed for business purposes the following categories of personal data. We do not knowingly sell, nor do we share or process for targeted advertising purposes, personal data about consumers under the age of 16.
Our Purposes for Processing Personal Data
– We use and disclose the personal data we collect for our commercial and business purposes, as further described above in the “Information We Collect, and Purposes of Processing” and the “Sharing Information With Third Parties” Sections.
Recipients of Personal Data
Although we do not sell personal data for monetary consideration, we do sell personal data, including sharing for targeted advertising purposes, subject to the choices you make on the Site, to the categories of third parties listed below:
– Advertising Companies; and
– Analytics Providers.
Your Rights Regarding Personal Data
– Residents of certain states have rights with respect to the personal data collected by businesses like ironSource. You may be able to exercise the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to certain exceptions and limitations:
The
right to confirm
whether we are processing personal data about you.
The
right to correct inaccuracies
in the personal data we have collected about you.
The right to know
the categories and specific pieces of personal data we collect, use, disclose, and sell about you, the categories of sources from which we collected your personal data, our purposes for collecting or selling your personal data, the categories of your personal data that we have either sold (including shared for targeted advertising purposes) or disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties with which we have disclosed personal data.
The right to request that we
delete the personal data
we have collected or maintain about the you.
The right to
opt out of our sale of your personal data and our processing (including sharing) for targeted advertising purposes
. Please note that if you opt out of certain practices, we may be unable to provide you with some services.
The right
not to receive discriminatory treatment
for the exercise of the above privacy rights.
While some states provide residents with rights related to “sensitive” personal data, ironSource does not collect this type of personal data.
Exercise Your Rights
You can submit a request by sending us an email to website-privacy-request@ironsrc.com.
In order to exercise the right to opt out of our sale or sharing of your personal data, including for targeted advertising purposes, use the cookie settings provided in the Site.
Depending on your state, if you have submitted a request that we have not fulfilled, you may contact us to appeal our decision by sending an email with the subject line “Appeal” to website-privacy-request@ironsrc.com.
You may also designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf by verifying your identity and providing the agent with a written permission to make the request on your behalf.
Verification Process and Required Information
Note that we may need to request additional information from you to verify your identity or process your request. You will not be required to create an account with us to submit a request or have it fulfilled.  We will require you to provide, at a minimum, your email address and state of residence. We may also ask you to provide us a few of your device identifiers, so that we can verify your identity. Once we verify your identity, we will request additional information necessary to authenticate the request.
Information about California resident requests: As required by California law, ironSource has provided the following information about requests it received from California residents from June 1, 2023 to May 31, 2024.
Changes to the Privacy Policy
We may revise this privacy policy from time to time. The most current version of the policy will govern our processing of information and is posted at https://www.is.com/privacy-policy/. If we make a change to this policy, we will post the revised privacy policy to this page.
Contact Us:
ironSource Ltd., located at 121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel, is the organization responsible for collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Information under this Privacy Policy.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at ironsource_privacy@unity3d.com.
Because email communications are not always secure, please do not include credit card or other sensitive information in your emails to us.
121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel
Attn: Data Protection Officer
You can also contact us as follows:
DPO@unity3d.com
ironSource Ltd., 121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel (Israel contact)
Unity Technologies, 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103 (United States contact)
Unity Technologies ApS, Niels Hemmingsens Gade 24, 1153 Copenhagen, Denmark (European Union contact)
Unity Technologies, GINZA SIX 8F, 6-10-1 Ginza, Chuo-ku, Tokyo Japan 104-0061 (Japan Contact)
By clicking “Accept Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Your Privacy
Functional Cookies
Performance Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Functional Cookies
Inactive
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
Inactive
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
Inactive
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising. Some 3rd party video providers do not allow video views without targeting cookies. If you are experiencing difficulty viewing a video, you will need to set your cookie preferences for targeting to yes if you wish to view videos from these providers. Unity does not control this.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 7
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/legal/privacy-policy/:
Legal
Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions Addendum
Data Sharing Addendum
Subprocessors
Tipalti Agreement
Guidelines
Advertiser & Creative Content Guidelines
Chartboost Core Contribution License Agreement
Privacy Policy
Last updated: April 19, 2024
OVERVIEW
This privacy policy (“
Privacy Policy
”) explains how information about our customers, visitors of our sites and end users is collected and utilized by Chartboost, Inc. (“
Chartboost
”, “
our
”, or “
we
”). This Privacy Policy applies to the websites provided by Chartboost, including without limitation
www.Chartboost.com
(“
Sites
”) and Chartboost’s advertising services (“
Chartboost Services
”). The Chartboost Services allow publishers of mobile applications to show ads on their applications, and advertisers to reach audiences that could be interested in their products or services. We also work with a number of partners in the ad tech ecosystem to enable the serving of ads on publisher apps. “
Customers
” refers to publishers, advertisers and other ad tech partners (current and prospective) and their employees, contractors, or agents. “
End Users
” refers to end users of our Customers’ services. “
You
” and “
your
” refer collectively to Sites visitors, Customers and End Users. If you have any concerns about this Privacy Policy you can send an email to
privacy@chartboost.com
.
1.          PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
In this Section, we outline the categories of personal information (“
Personal Information
”) we collect and how we collect it.
a) Categories of Personal Information Collected
Customers and Sites visitors:
Contact details
, such as name and email address.
Account registration information
, including the company for which you work, country of residence, password.
Technical Information
about your browser and device is automatically collected when you visit the Sites. These include IP address, the type and version of browser used to access the Sites, operating system, language of the browser and operating system, and type of device.
Information about how you
interacted with the Sites
(e.g. whether you clicked on a specific link, where you clicked, time spent on the Sites, etc.).
End Users:
Identifiers
such as Advertising ID (i.e. Google Advertising ID on Android devices, and ID For Advertising, on iOS devices), IP address and other similar identifiers. The Advertising ID is a resettable persistent identifier generated by Android or iOS that allows online advertising companies to recognize a device across apps, for advertising purposes. We can also identify an End User’s device using Chartboost’s internal device ID, which is linked to an End User’s Advertising ID. We may also create a temporary identifier on an app by app basis, which would not be linked to an End User’s Advertiser ID.
Contact Information
- If you contact our customer support team, we will collect your name and email address in order to respond to your request.
Technical device information
, including operating system name and version, device model, the name and version of the app to which the ad is served, SDK version and information about your settings (screen size, audio settings, language settings, time zone, internet connection type (e.g. WiFi), storage space, and battery status) and other similar information.
Campaign information
such as whether an ad was viewed, clicked on, and whether an app was installed and, if shared by the advertiser, actions performed within the app such as when an End User launches the app, how long the End User plays the app, and other in-app events (e.g. in-app purchases, level reached).
In addition, when an End User accesses a video ad, we and others may collect additional statistics about videos and video playback such as: start/boot-up information, amount played/session length information, memory on the device used for our video cache, videos cached on a device and complete view event.
b) How is Personal Information of Customers and Sites Visitors Collected?
We collect Customer Personal Information directly from the Customer upon:
Registration
: We collect the above listed Personal Information when a Customer signs up for the Chartboost Services.
Contact/Other requests
: On the Sites, we offer online forms to enable Customers to contact us. We also offer Customers the opportunity to request specific content, like newsletters and whitepapers we publish. We may ask for consent before we send information about the Chartboost Services in the future.
We automatically collect the Personal Information of a visitor of the Sites through
cookies and beacons
. A “cookie” is a small piece of data that is stored on your computer or mobile device. Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our Sites. We may also allow third parties to place cookies on our Sites to track use of the Sites to enable us to analyze the traffic of our marketing pages. The Sites or the emails we send may also use web beacons (also called “clear GIFs” or “pixel tags”) and similar technologies in conjunction with cookies. Our Sites also use information collected in our log files (such as Internet Protocol Address, referring URLs, etc.) about activities on the Sites to better understand how the Sites are used, resolve technical problems, and enhance the experience of Site visitors. For more information about the cookies we use, please review our
Cookie Policy Notice
.
c) How is Personal Information of End Users Collected?
Chartboost works with advertisers, publishers and other ad tech partners. For example, Chartboost helps advertisers promote their products and services by allowing them to bid on advertising inventory and serve ads to their desired audiences. Chartboost also works with publishers (e.g. mobile apps) that have advertising inventory available on their platform for advertisers to buy.  Chartboost also works as an intermediary connecting advertisers and publishers directly as well as platforms that consolidate advertiser demand and publisher supply.
When an ad is served through the Chartboost Services, we may collect the above listed Personal Information either:
directly from the End Users’ devices
when our software developer kit (SDK) is integrated into the publisher app on which the ad is displayed (for example, if you see an ad that was served by us on an app that you use, we would have collected your Personal Information directly from that app);
from the advertiser
who would decide the Personal Information they want to share with us when creating their campaign;
from other third-parties
within the ad tech ecosystem, such as third party data providers or other advertising services companies.
2.          HOW WE USE PERSONAL INFORMATION
In this Section, we outline how we process the Personal Information of our Customers, Sites visitors and of End Users, including how long we retain the Personal Information for.
a) Business and Commercial Purposes of Personal Information Collection and Use
We generally collect and use the above-listed categories of Personal Information to best serve you and deliver, support, and market the Chartboost Services.
More specifically, we collect and use the Personal Information of
Customers and Sites visitors
for the following purposes:
To provide the Sites to our Customers.
To create, maintain, customize, and secure our Customers’ accounts with us.
To provide Customers with customized content or targeted offers.
To allow Customers to offer advertising inventory and/or bid on advertising inventory and serve ads.
To report information about a Customer’s ad campaign.
With consent, to send information, newsletters, and promotional materials from us or on behalf of our group of companies and marketing partners.
We collect and use the Personal Information of
End Users
for the following purposes:
To provide the Chartboost Services to our Customers. As outlined above, Chartboost works with advertisers, publishers and ad tech partners. Chartboost helps advertisers promote their products and services by allowing them to bid on advertising inventory and serve ads to their desired audiences. Chartboost works with publishers (e.g. mobile apps) that have advertising inventory available on their platform for advertisers to buy. Chartboost also works as an intermediary connecting advertisers and publishers directly as well as platforms that consolidate advertiser demand and publisher supply. Ads can be:
personalized and based on your potential interests, the interests of users similar to you, and what you are most likely to engage with when you consent to this (taking into account the nature of ads and apps you typically engage with) - we refer to these as “personalized ads”; and/or
served based on your device technical information, the content of the publisher platform the ad will be displayed on and current or prior geolocation (if you are in a specific country, the ads would be relevant to that location) - we refer to these as “contextual ads”.
To derive inferences from the above categories of Personal Information and create a personalized profile to better identify goods and services that could be of interest to you. The information we infer, access, and collect may determine the nature of the ad that the End User sees.
To optimize Customers’ advertising campaigns, including by re-targeting End Users based on usage patterns.
To report to our Customers information about an ad campaign, including for example, when you saw or clicked on ads, whether you downloaded an advertised app and your purchases in an advertised app.
To prevent you from seeing the same ad or similar ads too many times.
If Customers do not want to expose End Users to personalized advertising campaigns, Customers can choose to opt out of personalized advertising by following the relevant instructions as set out on the Sites.
Finally, we collect and use the Personal Information of
Customers, Sites visitors and End Users
for the following purposes:
To detect and prevent fraud and unauthorized transactions.
To improve the usability and design of our Sites and the Chartboost Services by analyzing user interactions, feedback, and/or navigation patterns, which allows us to understand how our Sites and the Chartboost Services are being used and to identify areas for improvement as well as to develop new products or services within the ad tech ecosystem.
To monitor, protect, and maintain the operation, security and integrity of the Sites, the Chartboost Services and our business.
To communicate with you, including by responding to your inquiries, requesting feedback from you, and sending you updates about the Sites, the Chartboost Services, and this Privacy Policy.
To comply with applicable laws and regulations and respond to lawful requests and communications from law enforcement and other government officials.
To carry out sales and business transactions in which information held by us is among the assets transferred or is otherwise relevant to the evaluation, negotiation, or completion of the transaction.
To protect our rights, privacy, safety, property and/or those of others.
To fulfill any other purpose for which you provide your Personal Information or as explained to you at the point of information collection.
b) Retention
We retain Personal Information for as long as is necessary or as permitted in light of the purpose(s) for which it was obtained and consistent with applicable law. To determine the appropriate retention period of Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of Personal Information; the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the Personal Information; the purpose for which we use the Personal Information; whether we can achieve the purposes through other means; and the applicable legal requirements (e.g. legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements).
If you are a Customer, we retain your Personal Information for as long as you have an account with us or keep using the Chartboost Services. Please refer to Section 9 to see how you can delete your account or information.
The Personal Information of Sites visitors is retained in accordance with our cookie policy.
The Personal Information of End Users is retained for a maximum of 365 days, after which it is either anonymized or destroyed.
We will store information for longer periods when complying with our legal and regulatory obligations, to defend Chartboost interests (in case of a dispute), for archiving or statistical purposes in which case we will take appropriate measures to ensure that the information is used solely for this purpose.
More information, including a description of your legal rights, can be found below in the “Privacy Rights and Requests” Section.
3.          LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING
Some jurisdictions require a legal basis for processing personal data. In this Section, we outline the different legal bases we rely on depending on the processing activity.
DATA SUBJECT
PROCESSING ACTIVITY
LEGAL BASIS
PERSONAL INFORMATION USED
End Users
Displaying personalized advertising on publisher platforms (e.g. mobile applications).
Consent obtained by the publisher
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Displaying contextual advertising - i.e. advertising based on the content of the publisher platform you visit, technical parameters of the device or current or prior geolocation.
Legitimate Interest
IP address
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Attribution - i.e. matching user conversions (e.g. purchases, app installs) to campaign events, like clicks and displays.
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Improvement of the Chartboost Services
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users, Customers and Sites visitors
Fraud prevention and detection
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
Technical Information
Information about Sites interactions
End Users
Reporting
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Frequency capping
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
Customers
Provision of the Chartboost Services to Customers
Performance of a contract
Contact details
Account registration information
Technical Information
Customers
Marketing communications
Consent
Contact details
Technical Information
Sites interaction
4.          INFORMATION DISCLOSURE
In this Section we outline who we may disclose your Personal Information with:
Processors and service providers.
We contract with vendors to provide some part of the Sites and the Chartboost Services or to assist us in analyzing our services or information. Chartboost may provide Personal Information to such processors and service providers, or they may collect information from you on our behalf or on behalf of our Customers.
Marketing, advertising, and analytics partners.
When we collect or receive End User data, we disclose this information to third parties with whom we have a strategic relationship with, including on behalf of our Customers, to provide the Chartboost Services. These partners include advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners. The Personal Information disclosed to these partners can be used to measure how effective ads are, to track ad conversions, to offer advertising inventory, bid on advertising inventory, to serve ads, to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience, for industry analysis and to create personalized profiles.
These partners may collect information about your online activities over time and across different websites and applications.
Public authorities.
We may be required to disclose information about you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. We will disclose such information to government or law enforcement officials as we, in our sole discretion, believe necessary or appropriate to respond to legal process (including but not limited to subpoenas), to protect the property and rights of Chartboost, our Customers, End Users, or any third party, to protect the safety of the public or any person, or to prevent or stop activity we may consider to be, or to pose a risk of being, illegal, unethical or legally actionable.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction.
In the event of a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may disclose or transfer your Personal Information to certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisers.
Our subsidiaries and affiliates.
We may transmit your Personal Information to our subsidiaries and affiliates for processing in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Other third parties.
We will disclose your Personal Information to third parties if you or our Customers direct us to do so or you consent to such sharing. In addition, we will disclose your Personal Information as we believe necessary or appropriate to: (a) comply with applicable law; (b) enforce our terms and conditions; (c) protect our operations; (d) protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, and/or those of you or others; (e) allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain; or (f) private parties in response to a subpoena or other valid legal process.
Aggregate or anonymous data.
We may disclose aggregate or anonymous information about End Users to our Customers and other advertisers, publishers, business partners, sponsors, or third parties.
5.          PRIVACY PRACTICES OF CUSTOMERS AND THIRD PARTIES
End Users should review that Customers’ privacy policies. We do not control and are not responsible for the privacy practices of any Customer or other third party, and any website or service that links to or from our Sites or the Chartboost Services. This Privacy Policy applies solely to information collected by Chartboost.
6.          INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
Chartboost is a company based in the United States. In the context of the provision of the Chartboost Services, your Personal Information is processed, transferred and stored in the United States and other countries that may not have privacy laws equivalent to the country where you reside.
When your information is in another country, it may be accessed by the courts, law enforcement, and national security authorities pursuant to the laws of that country. If you reside in the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland, we rely on Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission (available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/publications/standard-contractual-clauses-international-transfers_en
) and/or other approved legal mechanisms to transfer personal data from the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland to countries located outside of these locations (as applicable).
7.          CONFIDENTIALITY AND SECURITY
We follow generally accepted industry standards and maintain appropriate safeguards to help protect the security, integrity, and privacy of the information we collect about you. These security measures are designed to protect against the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, misuse, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, the information under our control. However, no system can be 100% secure and we cannot guarantee our security measures.
8.          END USER CHOICES
Sites visitors/Customers:
You can control how your browser responds to cookies by adjusting the privacy and security settings of your web browser. However, some features of our Sites, including certain features made available to Customers may not function properly if you disable cookies.
End Users:
To learn more about interest-based advertising, and to access the opt-outs of certain online advertising companies, visit the Network Advertising Initiative at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/#completed
or Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. For individuals from the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland, you can visit Your Online Choices at
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You can opt out of interest-based advertisements by adjusting the settings on your mobile device. Each device and browser you use may have separate settings.
For iOS mobile devices, go to “Settings” from the device’s home screen; scroll down to “Privacy”; select “Advertising”; and turn on “Limit Ad Tracking.”
For Android mobile devices, go to “Google Settings” on the device; select “Ads”; and check the box labeled “Opt Out of Interest-Based Ads.”
At the app level, check the (Privacy) Settings section of the app. This setting and the language may vary by app and by where you are located. You may have to perform this action on each app.
You can review
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choices
for more information regarding how you can opt out via the mobile platform. If you would like to disable the collection of your mobile device geolocation information, you can make this selection on your mobile device.
You should complete the opt-out process for all devices and browsers you use. If you opt-out of interest-based advertising, you will still receive general advertisements but these might not be as relevant to you.
9.          PRIVACY RIGHTS AND REQUESTS
If you are a resident of the EU, Switzerland, or other jurisdictions with similar rules for data protection, Chartboost recognizes that you may have privacy rights listed below in relation to your Personal Information. Privacy rights that you may have include:
The right to obtain, at reasonable intervals and free of charge, confirmation as to what personal data about you Chartboost processes.
The right to object to the processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes or based on your particular situation.
The right to have your personal data rectified or corrected, blocked or deleted if the data are incorrect, incomplete, irrelevant, outdated or processed unlawfully.
The right to receive the personal data Chartboost processes about you in a structured and commonly used format and to transmit those data to another controller.
The right to obtain information about how your data has been shared with third-parties.
The right to revoke consent and have data processed on such a basis to be erased.
Chartboost Services interface tools.
If you are a Customer, some of your Personal Information can be changed or deleted by following the process provided in your Chartboost Services account, unless we must keep the information for legitimate business or legal reasons. If you delete certain portions of your information, your account may become deactivated.
Support requests
. If the request you wish to make is not possible through your Chartboost Services account, you can file a support request by visiting:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
Identity verification.
We may request evidence of your identity for verification purposes. We will respond to your request within the applicable statutory term.
End User request.
If an End User exercises any of their rights with you with respect to the processing of their Personal Information by us, please use the tools in your Chartboost Services Account to accommodate their request, or, if this is not possible, please visit:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
U.S. STATE PRIVACY RIGHTS
A.          Summary of Categories of Personal Information Collected, Sold, and Shared for End Users
Category of Personal Information Collected
Is this Category Sold or Shared?
Contact information
, including your name, email address.
No
Other identifiers
, including Advertising ID (i.e. Google Advertising ID on Android devices, and ID For Advertising, on iOS devices), IP address and other similar identifiers.
Yes
Technical app and device information
, including operating system name and version, Bundle ID, device model, the name and version of the app to which the ad is served, SDK version and information about your settings (screen size, audio settings, language settings, time zone, internet connection type (e.g. WiFi), storage space, and battery status) and other similar information.
Yes
Coarse geolocation data (derived from IP address)
, including the location of the device you use and your country.
Yes
Campaign information and statistics
, including whether you view and how you interacted with an ad and/or publisher app.
Yes
Inferences
, meaning inferences that we draw from the above categories of Personal Information to create a personalized profile so we can better identify goods and services that could  be of interest to you.
No
B.          Summary of Categories of Personal Information Collected, Sold, and Shared for Sites Visitors and Customers
Category of Personal Information Collected
Is this Category Sold or Shared?
Identifiers
, including your name, email address, IP address, or other similar identifiers.
Yes (IP address)
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, such as IP address, cookie information and how you interacted with the Sites (e.g. whether you clicked on a specific link, where you clicked, time spent on the Sites, etc.)
Yes
Technical information
, including the type and version of browser used to access the Sites, operating system, language of the browser and operating system, and type of device.
Yes
Coarse geolocation data
, including the location of the device you use and your country.
No
Professional or employment-related information
, including the company you work for.
No
As indicated in the chart, we “sell” or “share” (as such terms are defined in California law and other applicable laws) some of these categories to business partners and third parties, such as data analytics providers, advertising technology vendors, and social media platforms for marketing purposes and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy. We do not knowingly sell or share Personal Information about persons under the age of 16. Please click
here
to opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information by Chartboost.
Depending on your U.S. state of residences, you may have the following rights:
Right to Know:
The right to know what Personal Information we have collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information and the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you. Please note that we may not be required to respond to your requests “to know” or access specific pieces of Personal Information more than twice in any 12-month period.
Right to Data Portability:
The right to access your Personal Information in a portable format.
Right to Delete:
The right to request that we delete Personal Information that we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Correct:
The right to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we may maintain about you, subject to appropriate verification.
Right to Opt Out of Certain Types of Personal Information Uses and Disclosures:
We use and disclose to third parties’ Personal Information for analytics and advertising purposes. Accordingly, you may have the right to opt out of the “sale” or "sharing” of your Personal Information, or the use and disclosure of your Personal Information for “targeted advertising” (as these terms are defined in applicable law).
If you are interested in exercising any of the above-listed rights, please visit:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
To protect your privacy, we may require the matching of up to three pieces of Personal Information provided with your request with Personal Information we maintain to verify that it is you making the request. Where applicable, we will use the requested information for verification purposes only. Please note that we can decline a request where we are unable to verify your identity and confirm the Personal Information we maintain relates to you.
Exercising Your Sale and Sharing Opt-Out Right
As detailed in the table above, we “sell” and “share” certain categories of Personal Information to and with third parties. If you are 16 years of age or older, in addition to the rights described above, you have the right to direct us to not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information at any time. To exercise your opt-out right, you can submit a request to us by clicking on the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link at the bottom of any of the Sites’ web pages or completing and submitting the form available
here
.
Upon receipt of your request, we will endeavor to honor it based on the information that we collect and maintain.
Authorized Agents.
Residents of certain U.S. states may also use an authorized agent to submit the requests described above. The agent will need to provide us with signed permission from you to act on your behalf. Please note that we may contact you to verify your identity and/or request from you or the agent documentation demonstrating that they have the authority to act on your behalf.
Appeals.
Depending on your U.S. state of residence, you may have the right to appeal a decision we have made in connection with your privacy rights request. To appeal a decision, please contact us at
privacy@chartboost.com
.
Complaints.
If you do not agree with this Privacy Policy or the way Chartboost processes information about you, you can also lodge a complaint to a competent supervisory authority in your country of residence.
10.          COMMUNICATIONS
We may provide notice to our Customers via e-mail, written or hard copy, or through posting on our Sites, as determined by us in our sole discretion.
11.          CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We reserve the right to make changes to this Privacy Policy at any time, at our sole discretion. Any relevant changes or modifications to this Privacy Policy will be notified to you by the posting of a notice on the Sites and, if you are a Customer, you may also be notified by either e-mail or other means of communication, as set out in Section 10. If you access the Chartboost Services after the new version of the Privacy Policy is published and/or communicated to you, you agree to its new terms; should you disagree with the terms of the new version, you must cease using the Sites and the Chartboost Services. If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy, we will change the “Last Updated” date above.
12.          CONTACT
If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, or have any concerns about privacy, please contact us at:
Address: Chartboost, Inc., One Sansome Street, Floor 21, San Francisco, CA 94104
Email:
privacy@chartboost.com
Attn: Data Protection Officer
© 2025 Chartboost, LLC.
Chartboost.com
Legal
Cookie Settings
Sub-policy 8
https://pubmatic.com/legal/privacy/:
POLICIES
Ad Choices
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Ad Quality Policy
Careers Privacy Policy
CCPA Privacy Policy
Platform Cookie Policy
PubMatic Properties Privacy Policy
Website Cookie Policy
TERMS
DSR Notice
EEA Data Subject Rights Notice
Opt-Out of the Sale of Personal Information
PubMatic Opt-Out
You can view an archive of our older policies
here
.
About Cookies On This Site
We use cookies to personalize and enhance your experience on our site. Visit our
Privacy Policy
to learn more or manage your personal preferences in our
Cookie Consent Tool
. By using our site, you agree to our use of cookies.
Decline
Accept
Options
Sub-policy 9
https://www.vervetx.com/privacy-policy:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Cookiebot
2
Learn more about this provider
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
CookieConsent
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Snazzy Maps
2
Learn more about this provider
ARRAffinity
Used to distribute traffic to the website on several servers in order to optimise response times.
ARRAffinitySameSite
Used to distribute traffic to the website on several servers in order to optimise response times.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
__cf_bm
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
_cfuvid
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Google
4
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_ga_#
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_gat
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_gid
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
Unclassified
1
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
Cloudflare
1
Learn more about this provider
cf.turnstile.u
Pending
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 3/13/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please state your consent ID and date when you contact us regarding your consent.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Deny
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all
Skip to main content
Home
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
LAST REVISED: December 4, 2024
Verve Therapeutics, Inc. (“Verve”) respects the privacy of visitors to its website. This Privacy Policy is provided to describe how Verve may collect, use, process, protect, and in some cases, disclose, your Personal Information (as defined below) that is submitted through our website.
BY PROVIDING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION TO VERVE OR OTHERWISE USING OUR WEBSITE OR MOBILE APPLICATIONS, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU UNDERSTAND THE TERMS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY AND WISH TO CONTINUE TO PROVIDE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED.
For information on our website’s other Terms of Use, please see https://www.vervetx.com/terms-use. The provisions of this Privacy Policy apply only to Personal Information collected via the Verve website. This Privacy Policy does not replace any consent form or notice that you may separately receive in connection with Verve’s use or sharing of your information.
The Verve website contains links to third-party websites and other online services and content that are not owned or controlled by Verve. This Privacy Policy does not apply to those third-party properties, and Verve is not responsible for the content of those properties or for how those properties treat your information. You should review the privacy policies and terms of use associated with those third-party properties if you decide to access them. However, we do receive information from certain third-party websites with whom we partner, and the terms of this Privacy Policy apply to this information once we receive it in the same manner as these terms apply to information that we collect through our website. For example, some of our clinical trial-related web pages are hosted by third-party vendors, such as Patient Engagement Advisors.
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “Personal Information” means any information relating to an individual that can be directly or indirectly used to identify that individual, including but not limited to, name, physical address, email address, phone number, identification numbers, health information, location data, online identifiers (such as an IP address), or one or more factors specific to the individual’s physical, physiological, genetic, mental, cultural, or social identity. Personal Information does not include anonymized information or information that is reported in the aggregate and cannot be traced back to an individual.
Information We Collect
We may collect Personal Information from our website users, job applicants, potential and current business partners, service provider employees, consultants, health care professionals, patients, potential and current clinical trial participants, clinical trial investigators, and others with whom we do business. We collect this information directly from individuals, from service providers, data brokers, business partners, government agencies, recruiters, social media, and through our website as outlined below.
Personal Information You Provide
We collect the Personal Information you give us—such as by signing up for our e-mail alerts, e-mailing us, applying for a job, submitting clinical trial recruitment-related forms, submitting investment inquiries, working as our business partner or as a consultant, and participating in clinical trials.
Personal Information that we may collect from you may include:
Identifiers and Contact Information:
name, address, email addresses, phone numbers, account names and other unique personal identifiers, online identifiers, Social Security numbers, driver’s license numbers, passport numbers and other similar identifiers
Biographical and Demographic Information:
date of birth, gender, age, marital status, race, ethnicity, and information regarding parents or legal guardians
Professional and Employment Information:
job title, organizational affiliation, professional credentials, employment history, education history, resume/curriculum vitae, background checks, and other information provided to us directly from you, or from third-party employment websites, or public databases.
Health and Medical Information:
information pertaining to treatments and medication, insurance information, medical history, and lab results (provided in connection with clinical trials, patient support programs, adverse event reporting, and other research-related activities)
Financial Information:
tax classification and exemption status, bank account information, and other payment related information (in connection with submitting an investigator-sponsored research proposal, as a consultant or service provider, or an investigator in a clinical trial)
Audio or Visual Information:
audio or video recordings or photographs
Commercial Information:
services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Inference Information:
information used to create a profile about user to reflect the user’s preferences and characteristics
Security and Access Information:
usernames and passwords for accounts that you create on our website or mobile application
Other information that you may provide through our website
Information We Collect from Third Parties
We may purchase or otherwise acquire information from third parties, including data brokers, third party service providers, and business partners. We may also collect information from public databases, government agencies, and social media.
Information We Collect Automatically
We automatically collect certain information, including Personal Information, about visitors to our website. We do this through the use of cookies, tags, and other similar web tools and tracking technologies. For more information about cookies, and the extent to which they can be declined, please see the “Cookie Policy” section, below.
Information that we collect automatically may include: details about the devices that are used to access our website (such as the IP address and type of operating system and web browser), dates and times of visits to, and use of, our website, information about how our website is used (such as the content that is viewed on our website and how users navigate between pages),URLs that refer visitors to our website, and search terms used to reach our website.
How We Use Information We Collect
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may use the information we collect, including Personal Information, for our business, development and research, and commercial purposes to:
Communicate information to you about our products, programs (including clinical trials), and business
Respond to your requests and inquiries, including requests related to our clinical trials Process grants and sponsorship applications
Process employment applications
Analyze and respond to product and safety concerns
Recruit for, manage, and conduct our clinical trials and other product or investigational programs
Facilitate contact with you regarding clinical trials, including contact that may be initiated by our research partners or the clinical trial sites participating in our clinical trials
Identify, facilitate, and manage business relationships, enter into contracts, and provide necessary payment or billing
Collect publicly available information about your professional occupation, including licensing information and other information such as debarment and regulatory or disciplinary history (if you are a health care provider or other consultant under contract or being considered for a contractual relationship with us)
Improve our website, related applications, and mobile applications
Develop and customize the content we display and send you in our communications, website, related applications, and mobile applications
Analyze communication strategies (such as your interactions with us, including on our website and mobile applications)
Investigate and respond to misuse of our website, related applications, and mobile applications
Comply with applicable legal and regulatory requirements, judicial processes, and Verve policies
As otherwise specified in other privacy policies or consent forms that may be provided to you depending on your relationship with Verve and what programs you may participate in
We may combine any of the information we collect, including Personal Information, with information from other sources, such as public records or websites or offline interactions with you (for example, by telephone or in person).
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the Personal Information we collect from you to create information that does not identify any individual, and use that information for the above-listed purposes and other business purposes.
This Privacy Policy places no restriction on our use of non-personally identifiable information that we may collect from your visit to our website, such as questions, comments, ideas, or suggestions. By providing such information to us, you understand and agree that Verve has no obligation to you whatsoever regarding that information and is free to disclose it through any means and use it for any purpose and without compensation to you.
How We Share Information We Collect
We may share the information we collect, including Personal Information, with third parties for the purposes described above. These third parties include:
Service providers of Verve, such as vendors, consultants, data storage and analytics providers, content providers, and technology providers (including technology support providers, web hosting providers, communications providers, and application developers)
Other business partners with whom we collaborate regarding our investigational products and programs, such as scientific advisors, joint venture partners, research partners, and strategic collaboration partners
Regulators worldwide, as required by law, including in connection with monitoring, review and approval of our clinical trials, products and services, and adverse event reporting
Other third parties if required to comply with law, regulation, or judicial process or to protect the security, rights, and property of Verve or of users of our website
Unless prohibited by applicable law, we may also share Personal Information as part of a purchase, transfer, joint venture, or sale of Verve or its assets, such as in a merger or corporate reorganization. If this occurs, the information will be subject to the policies of the receiving organization.
How We Protect Information We Collect
While Verve has endeavored to create a secure and reliable website for our users, the confidentiality of any communication or material, including any Personal Information contained within it, transmitted to or from Verve via the website or e-mail cannot be guaranteed. Verve maintains reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect your Personal Information once received. However, no system is completely secure or error-free, and third-party bad actors may still compromise these measures even if they are performed diligently and without error. Verve does not, and cannot, guarantee the complete security of your Personal Information.
How Long We Keep Information We Collect
We may keep the information we collect, including Personal Information, as long as necessary for the purpose for which it was collected and for as long as allowed or required by applicable law.
Your Privacy Choices and Rights
You may update your communication preferences and the Personal Information you provide to us at any time by following the instructions on the relevant page of our website or by contacting us as described in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy.
If you have provided Personal Information to us through a third-party website, you should contact that website to update that Personal Information or your communication preferences related to that website.
If you sign up to receive our e-mail alerts, you may unsubscribe at any time by following the instructions included in the e-mails. However, even if you unsubscribe, we may continue to send you other types of e-mail communications, such as about changes in our policies.
For information about the choices and rights you have with respect to cookies, please see the section of this Privacy Policy titled “Cookie Policy”.
Users who are located in certain jurisdictions may have additional choices and rights regarding their Personal Information and our processing of that Information. Please refer to the applicable section of the Policy for your jurisdiction.
Information for California Residents
California Residents, as defined under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA), may be able to exercise the following rights as to Personal Information. The rights below only apply to the extent your Personal Information is covered by the CCPA. Your rights may be limited when required or allowed by law.
Right to know:
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your Personal Information over the past 12 months. Once we receive your request and confirm your identity, we will disclose to you:
The categories of Personal Information we collected about you
The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you
The categories of sources of the Personal Information we collected about you
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting your Personal Information
The categories of third parties with whom we share that Personal Information, the categories of Personal Information we have sold about you (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the information was sold
Right to Request Deletion:
You have the right to request the deletion of Personal Information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions
Right to Correct:
You have the right to request a correction of inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you
Right to Opt-Out of “Sale” of Personal Information:
Verve does not “sell” Personal Information under the CCPA
Right to Non-Discrimination:
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights
Sensitive Personal Information
Some information that we may collect is considered to be more sensitive, such as social security numbers, geolocation, health information, or ethnic or racial origin. Verve only uses and discloses Sensitive Personal Information for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or in accordance with any other notice that you have received or consent that you have provided.
How to Exercise Your Rights
To exercise your rights, please submit a request via email at
privacy@vervetx.com
. Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a submit a request. In order for us to comply with the request, you must provide us with enough information to identify you, such as your name and email address. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf by drafting, signing, and notarizing a letter that makes clear (i) the identity of your agent and (ii) the purposes for which you are appointing the agent. We will only use Personal Information provided in the request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make it.
Collection of Personal Information
In the last 12 months, we have collected identifiers and contact information, biographical and demographic information, professional and employment information, health and medical information, financial information, audio and visual information, commercial information, internet and geolocation information, inferences and other information consumers may provide us. For more information on the types of Personal Information we collect and the categories of sources we collect it from, please see the “Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy. We collect this information for the purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy. We share the categories of Personal Information with third parties for business purposes as described in the “How We Share Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy.
Minors Under Age 16
We do not sell or share the Personal Information of consumers we know are less than 16 years old.
California’s “Shine the Light” Law
California’s “Shine the Light” law (Civil Code Section § 1798.83) permits users of our website who are California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of Personal Information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. We currently do not provide Personal Information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To opt-out of having your Personal Information disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes in the future, please email us at privacy@vervetx.com with the subject line “California Shine the Light Request”.
Information for Washington Residents
If the processing of Personal Information about you is considered consumer health information subject to the Washington My Health My Data Act (“MHMDA”), you have certain additional rights with respect to that information. MHMDA protects consumer health data that is not protected under HIPAA. This section of the Privacy Policy applies to personal information defined as “consumer health data” subject to MHMDA.
Consumer Health Data We Collect
As described in the “Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy, the data we collect depends on how you interact with us, the services you use, and the choices you make. Because consumer health data is defined very broadly, many of the categories of data we collect are or could be considered consumer health data. Consumer health data can include:
information about your health-related conditions, symptoms, status, diagnoses, testing (including tests, diagnostics, or other interventions), or treatments. We may collect such information through your navigation of our website, surveys or other communication with you.
measurements of bodily functions, vital signs, or characteristics, including photographs, which may also be considered biometric information under the MHMDA.
information that could identify your attempt to seek health care services or information, including services that allow you to assess, measure, improve, or learn about your or another person’s health.
other information that may be used to infer or derive data related to the above or other health information.
Sources of Consumer Health Data
As described further in the “Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy, we collect Personal Information (which may include consumer health data) directly from you, from your interactions with our services, from third parties, and from publicly available sources.
Why We Collect and Use Consumer Health Data
We collect and use consumer health data for the purposes described in the “How We Use Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy. Primarily, we collect and use consumer health data as reasonably necessary to provide you with the products or services you have requested or authorized. This may include delivering and operating the products or services and their features, personalization of certain product features, ensuring the secure and reliable operation of the services and the systems that support them, troubleshooting and improving the services, and other essential business operations that support the provision of the products (such as analyzing our performance, meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce, and conducting research and development). We may use consumer health data for other purposes for which we give you choices and/or obtain your consent as required by law – for example, for advertising or marketing purposes.
Our Sharing of Consumer Health Data
We may share each of the categories of consumer health data described above for the purposes described in the “How We Share Information We Collect” section of this Privacy Policy. In particular, we may share Personal Information, including consumer health data, with your consent or as reasonably necessary to complete any transaction or provide any products or services you have requested or authorized, as described in the previous section above.
Third Parties With Which We Share Consumer Health Data
As necessary for the purposes described above, we share consumer health data with the following categories of third parties:
Service providers. Vendors or agents (“processors”) working on our behalf may access consumer health data for the purposes described above. For example, companies we’ve hired to provide customer service support or assist in protecting and securing our systems may need access to data to provide those functions.
Parties to a corporate transaction. We may disclose consumer health data as part of a corporate transaction or proceeding such as a merger, financing, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, or a transfer, divestiture, or sale of all or a portion of our business or assets.
Government agencies. We will disclose consumer health data to law enforcement or other government agencies when we believe doing so is necessary to comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process.
Other third parties. In certain circumstances, it may be necessary to provide data to other third parties, for example, to comply with the law or to protect our rights or those of our customers.
Other users and individuals. If you use our services to interact with other users of the service or other recipients of communications, such as a provider, we will share data, including consumer health data, as directed by you and your interactions.
How to Exercise Your Rights
MHMDA, if applicable, provides certain rights with respect to consumer health data, including rights to access, delete, or withdraw consent relating to such data, subject to certain exceptions. You can request to exercise such rights using the various tools and mechanisms described in this Privacy Policy. If your request to exercise a right under the MHMDA is denied, you may appeal that decision by contacting us as described in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Policy, or you may raise a concern or lodge a complaint with the Washington Attorney General at
https://www.atg.wa.gov/file-complaint
Information for Residents of the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), your Personal Information may be protected by data protection laws in the EEA or UK, such as the European Union General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Verve will comply with these data protection laws when it uses and shares your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy.
When using or sharing your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy (including transfers out of the EEA and UK described below), Verve relies on the following lawful bases, as appropriate:
Our legitimate interests, such as operating our business
Performance of an employment or other contract with you or pre-contractual measures
Compliance with our legal obligations
With your consent, when applicable
Verve is headquartered in the United States, and as a result, your Personal Information will be processed by Verve in the United States. Verve may contract with service providers to process your Personal Information on Verve’s behalf; these service providers may be located outside of the EEA and UK. Data protection laws in the United States or other countries may not offer you the same protections as the laws of the country in which you are residing when your Personal Information is collected. By using this Site and by submitting your Personal Information to Verve, you consent to the transfer of your Personal Information to any country and its use and disclosure in accordance with applicable U.S. federal and state laws and with this Privacy Policy.
Data protection laws in the EEA and UK may provide you the following legal rights with respect to your Personal Information used and shared by Verve:
To withdraw consent at any time, if we are using and sharing your Personal Information on the basis of consent
To access the Personal Information that Verve maintains about you
To request that Verve rectify errors or erase your Personal Information
To request that Verve restrict the way it uses or shares your Personal Information
To object to the way Verve uses or shares your Personal Information
To ask Verve to transfer your Personal Information to someone else
To lodge a complaint with a data protection authority in the EEA or UK
Verve’s ability or obligation to comply with your requests may be limited by applicable law. To request to exercise one of these rights, please contact us as described in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy.
Verve’s legal representative in the EU is MyData-Trust, which is located at Waldeck House, Lyne Lane, Chertsey, KT16 0AW, United Kingdom. They may be contacted through Verve at the mailing and email addresses below.
Information for Residents of Australia and New Zealand
If you are located in Australia or New Zealand, your Personal Information may be protected by data protection laws of those countries. Verve will comply with these data protection laws when it uses and shares your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy.
If at any time you want to know exactly what Personal Information we hold about you, please contact us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy. Our file of your Personal Information will be made available to you within a reasonable time after we receive your request.
If at any time you wish to change any Personal Information we hold about you because it is inaccurate or out of date, please contact us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy, and we will amend your record.
Should you have any concerns or complaints about how we handle your Personal Information, please contact us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy. We will investigate your complaint and will use reasonable endeavors to respond to you in writing within a reasonable time of receiving your complaint. If we fail to respond to your complaint within a reasonable time of receiving it in writing or if you are dissatisfied with the response that you receive from us, you may have the right to make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC) or the New Zealand Privacy Commissioner, as applicable. Details of how to contact the OAIC are located at:
https://www.oaic.gov.au/about-us/contact-us
or the New Zealand Commissioner at:
https://www.privacy.org.nz/about-us/contactus/#:~:text=If%20you%20have%20a%20preferred,we%20can%20do%20to%20help
.
Verve’s Privacy Officer and Executive Director, Information Technology are the responsible data protection officers for Verve. Questions regarding this Policy can be submitted to Verve as described in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy.
Information for Residents of Canada
If you are located in Canada, your Personal Information may be protected by the data protection laws of Canada. Verve will comply with those applicable data protection laws when it uses and shares your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy. By using our website or otherwise interacting with us, you consent to the collection, use and disclosure of your Personal Information in accordance with the terms of and for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. Verve may seek consent to use and disclose Personal Information after it has been collected in those cases where we wish to use the Information for a new or different purpose, where consent has not already been obtained for such use or disclosure.
If you submit Personal Information of others to us in connection with access to our website, you represent that you have obtained the requisite consent and/or provided appropriate notifications, as required under applicable privacy laws, including such consent and/or notifications as may be required for the transfer of personal information outside of Canada.
You may have the right to access, update and correct inaccuracies on your Information or withdraw your consent to our further collection, use and disclosure of your Personal Information, subject to certain limited exceptions under applicable law. To exercise these rights, please contact us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy. Please be as specific as possible in relation to the Information you wish to access. Once we receive your request, we will review it, verify your identity, and process the request accordingly.
If you have any questions or complaints about our handling of your Personal Information or rights with respect to your Personal Information, please contact us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section of this Policy, and we will address your complaint, and otherwise further advise you of any rights you may have to complain to the relevant privacy commissioner(s).
Cookie Policy
Cookies are small amounts of data that your web browser stores on your device at the request of a website. Cookies are sent back to the originating web domain on your subsequent visits to that domain. Most websites contain elements from multiple web domains, so when you visit the website your browser may receive cookies from several sources.
By using our website or any of our applications, you consent to the use of cookies. Web browsers may offer users of our website the ability to disable receiving certain types of cookies; however, if cookies are disabled, some features or functionality of the website may not work correctly.
Cookies are useful because they allow our website to recognize the user’s device. Cookies also allow users to navigate between pages efficiently, recall preferences, and improve the user experience. For example, once you have completed the careers page registration process, a cookie may be used to avoid having you register again when you return to the page. Inquiries regarding our use of cookies may be directed to us at:
privacy@vervetx.com
.
Verve is not responsible for the cookie practices of third-party websites, including those which may be linked to from our website.
Cookies Used
ARRAffinity
ARRAffinitySameSite
__cf_bm
_cfuvid
CookieConsent
_ga&
_ga_#
_gat
_gid
Children’s Privacy
Our website is not directed toward children under the age of 13, and we do not knowingly collect Personal Information from children under the age of 13 through the website. We will delete information of children under the age of 13 if we learn any has been collected.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Verve may change this Privacy Policy from time to time, with changes effective as of the date indicated on the updated policy. You should check the website periodically for the latest updates to this Privacy Policy.
Contact Us
You may contact us with questions, comments, or complaints about this Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, or to exercise your rights regarding your Personal Information processed by us. When raising a request or complaint, please provide sufficient details (including your relationship with us) and any relevant documentation. Our contact information is as follows:
Verve Therapeutics, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Officer
201 Brookline Avenue
Boston, MA 02215
Email:
privacy@vervetx.com
Sub-policy 10
https://aps.amazon.com/aps/privacy-policy/:
Privacy Policy
Amazon Publisher Services Privacy Notice
A9.com, Inc. (“Amazon”) knows that you care how information about you is used and shared, and we appreciate your trust that we will do so carefully and sensibly.
Please note that Amazon owns and operates this web site and is a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Inc. If you have an account on Amazon.com and an Amazon.com cookie, information gathered by Amazon, as described in this Privacy Notice, may be correlated with any personally identifiable information that Amazon.com has and used by Amazon and Amazon.com to improve the services we offer.
As a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Amazon follows the same information practices as Amazon.com, and information we collect is subject to the Amazon.com Privacy Notice.
By visiting the aps.amazon.com or ams.amazon.com site, you are accepting the practices described in the
Amazon.com Privacy Notice
.